JOINS COUNCIL MEMBER JAMES, ASSEMBLYMEMBER JEFFRIES AT HOUSE WHERE ARMY VET WAS KILLED
The fact of the matter is I can trip over paper. So, in order to save my ankles, I have these.
you would think king oedipus paired with queen electra
**We want the American Dream that our parents and/or grandparents had - to get rich or well to do, but in this day and age, the rich/well to do don't consider the consequences of their actions;
Happy New Year to all of my blogging friends! I pray that 2012 will be a truly blessed year for all of us. 2011 was a little rough for us but we're starting to see the light at the end of that proverbial 'tunnel'. Praise the Lord for that!
was it
The vintage couple has been cut out from the 1926 paper. The wrinkled border is from 1922. So is the floral paper that has been cut out with the Swirling Lace punches (Martha Stewart). The paper with text on is called 1891 and has been punched with the Cherish punches, also by Martha Stewart.
Sometimes ethical. Cases for unethicality: you know the prostitute is a sex slave (trafficked), you are violating the trust of a significant other. But, if the prostitute is a worker, and you have no relational obligations to *not* pay for sex services—ethical.
03 - The Promised Land
But six or sevens senses shrouded,
· Details matter
½ cup raisins
Creating the 1K MBA will require some significant re-engineering. New principles will have to frame the design.
Yes, I felt closer to the event when I made the decision to move here. It was unavoidable. But then my mom gives me this book, One Tuesday Morning by Karen Kingsbury. (I know she gave it to me on purpose – probably to get me to cry for some messed up reason. That’s a joke mom, but seriously??) So I began to read about these tragic events that unfolded and I felt like I was thrown directly into the fire, literally. And I started probing my co-workers and asking some probably too-intense questions. I was just so interested. I think crying yourself to sleep for a few days over an event that happened ten years ago to 3,000 people you didn’t know can have a very strange effect on you. Ultimately, I feel like hindsight tells us to scream at all the NYPD and NYFD to get out of there even though they wouldn’t listen.
The arc of man's philosophy
“What do you think I’m doing now?” the fisherman replied.
Runner Up : Lovibonds - close run thing between these guys and Epic(NZ)
Proudest moment of your career?
to gather my words
Right now all the strawberry plants are blooming, blossoming with little white flowers and arching their leaves up to the sun. Oh, and I will need to transplant these three sunflower plants soon enough. They are outgrowing my little cup and I know sooner or later, they’ll realize fluorescent lighting doesn’t hold a candle to the real thing. Sunlight is one of the reasons I love gardening. Maybe not sunlight in the sweltering, humid days of July and August, when I wipe my brow with my arm and smudge dirt straight across my forehead like a slash of tribal paint; but sunlight in May and early June, when it’s still windy enough that the sun falls across my shoulders like a blanket, settling on my back and warming me. Sunlight that streams down and through the vibrant green leaves, turning them thin and transparent as paper, and keeps the bumblebees buzzing and the grass warm and lush beneath my bare feet. Sunlight so clear and bright it’s like seeing the world through crystal.
By the time we set sail and the ocean rippled and rocked our small boat, I was having tiny second thoughts. Whale sharks are the biggest fish on Earth, averaging 41,50 feet and 47,000 pounds. Maybe it wasn't such a good idea to get all up in their face. Just at that point, the bubbles rose up to reveal a cluster of polka-dotted whale sharks, surrounding our boat. It was almost like they were inviting us to join them.
Religion has been extremely dangerous from day one. Both Cain and Abel were religious. They both worshipped God but in different ways. Cain brought his offering to God, the fruit of the ground, and was not accepted. Abel brought his sacrifice, a lamb, thus shedding blood, and was accepted. This angered Cain and in Genesis 4:8, “Cain rose up against Abel his brother, and slew him.”
This week's theme is Discontinued polish. I haven't really gone out of my way to get my hands on a discontinued polish, so at first I wasn't sure what polish I was going to use for this week's theme. I probably would have just gone with China Glaze Party Hearty since I know that came out for Christmas 2010 collection. After doing some research (note typing in random names of polish that I owned) I discovered from Rebecca likes nails that I owned a discontinued polish, enter Sally Hansen Lime Lights (shown on my center fingers). So I sat it aside anxiously awaiting to post about it.
Salesman Lee Tuck Ming, 75, said that besides paying homage to ancestors, Qing Ming was an opportunity to reunite with his big family of 30.
So I'm working on cleaning the kitchen and I have this island table that I really don't like but it is efficient. Plans are for Hubby to make a cabinet to go here but not sure when that will happen. I didn't think I would need an island when we designed the kitchen or I would have had it made with the cabinets. So here is the table. I almost forgot the before pic, you can see it is galvanized tin on the bottom and galvanized legs. It just ruined the whole look of my beautiful kitchen but it is so useful that I just used it anyway. So yesterday I got out the Caromal Colors paint and went to work. Only takes one hand to wield a paintbrush. So before.....
He said, “what are you talking about?”
hat was an apparent reference to the slayings of 23 people whose bodies were found Friday in the border city of Nuevo Laredo, in northern Tamaulipas state. The bodies were found hanging from a bridge or decapitated and dumped near city hall Friday in Nuevo Laredo, where drug cartels are fighting an escalating turf war.
Julie @ Julies Stitchyknitter Journal
I'll be doing a review of that Taobao.com haul in an upcoming post, but for now, this is just a different velvet dress I picked up from Chicabooti recently. I'm so glad I found it, as I think it's such a wonderful staple dress for both winter or autumn. The dense texture creates an interesting, three-dimensional surface in jewel blue tones, but the design itself is simple and practical enough to be worn for any occasion. It makes a nice change from all the black dresses I've hoarded over my mission to find *that* one-for-all-event LBD (which by the way, does not exist in singularity. I don't believe it.)
Not a lot of love lost there, then. As for the cover of this Pan edition of The Only Girl in the Game, I can't tell you for sure who was responsible for that snazzy photo-montage, but it's possible David Larkin had a hand in it, as I think by this point he'd taken over as Pan's art director, moving the imprint's covers in a more photographic direction. As ever, if you want to know more about Pan Books, head over to the Pan Paperback Collectors Website, where you'll find a near-complete Pan bibliography and accompanying covers.
GLA Tory leader James Cleverly last night wrote to the authority’s anti-sleaze monitoring officer, Ed Williams, demanding an inquiry into Mr Livingstone’s expenses by the GLA Standards Committee. He claims Mr Livingstone may have breached the GLA’s code of conduct on three counts: Serving the public interest; accountability; and prudent use of public funds.
Obasanjo was in charge of his country’s security. Where were militants and Boko Haram when Obasnjo was active as Commander in Chief? Well, they were existing, but I don’t know of any who claimed to have masterminded attacks (Please I stand to be corrected). I revere the man Obasanjo for this singular reason which is grand to me. His domineering and somewhat autocratic style of leadership is enviable. Did you notice how he even talked to his governors during economic summits? “Governor Akwa Ibom, do you think we are here to joke?” As though the governors were his sons. After all, aren’t they? This charisma, guts and his aggressive mind of his is obviously traced not to his military background only but also as a war lord! Who the hell are you Boko Haram in the presence of the man who captured the Biafra war (Colonel Obasanjo of 3rd Marine Commando Division!)?
Well, we Northerners had to give it a try! So I made some for the Sil and Bro for our little celebration of their 29th wedding anniversary last Sunday, along with mac and cheese and hot dogs. Hey, they picked the menu!
I went to meet fellow tangologuers RuiySandra, they had organised a dinner at a tapas place, spoke to the owner and asked if they could have an informal milonga. "Fine", he said, "fine", we said.
Transformation
You can read about the sew along here and look at some finished dresses too! I ♥ this dress. I have always liked a good jumper....always! Of course, this will have to be graded up to fit a booblicious, curvy woman, such as myself.....and that task is daunting, but I gotta start somewhere.
Later that day we celebrated my Mom's birthday. I won't say which one although the cake may give it away. ;)
with living desire
Have there been other abuses? Almost certainly, but I can’t tell you what they are, because I don’t know. And nor does anybody else outside of government. And here lies the crux of the problem: the effects of the anti-terror legislation are hidden behind a veil of secrecy, while the legislation itself has been so expanded as to catch almost any act within it.
Red scarf - Marks & Spencer
So you guys are playing the Fest this year, but you also played it last year. Any memorable moments from last year?
Pearls: Want2Scrap**
Schifanoia consists of two talented young Brazilian women who are both already seasoned performers. In 2010, Schifanoia played 10 concerts in Brazil and the Netherlands. Both women are part of Collegium Musicum, perform in South America as well as in Europe and have each recorded CDs.
Pinal County – on the Gila River – WWII Japanese detention camp. May be renovated.
My son, toasting Mike at dinner, remembering his big grin and his bigger heart . . .
And I offer my sincerest apologies to idiots everywhere for lumping this monumental idiocy in with their garden variety and mostly harmless idiocy.
Three teenagers are going on the trip of a lifetime. Only one is coming back.
And, hey, if anyone wants to participate in this Interview swap I'm more than game!
I think I made John test-eat one before I committed, to make sure they were good. There’s no point in eating non-delicious food, especially if it’s not very healthy, although I don’t mind ingesting lots of butter if it’s for a good cause. (For instance, the cause of not leaving perfect, flaky, light croissants unconsumed.) There was no need to worry, though; the croissants were excellent. The rest of breakfast (eggs, mostly) was also good, although I ruined two eggs before realizing that the pepper grinders were filled with white pepper, which almost always tastes terrible to me and renders food inedible. (That “strong” flavor – let’s be polite here – is formed during the fermentation process that removes the outer black skin.)
Click here to read a vivid and detailed account of Mzilikazi’s exploits, as described by the talented Thomas Bulpin, in chapter 4 of his book: “Lost Trials of the Transvaal”.
Christmas at Water's Edge ... LMN ... 6 AM
I don't know the logic behind this, but somehow old-fashioned menu written with colorful chalks give me this warm feeling inside. It feels... homey... It rings true whether you're in a coffee shop at Manhattan, New York City, or at Starbucks, Singapore, or in this pizza parlor here in Jakarta!
I remember lying back on the skinny wall that separated our house from the large detached house over the back and looking up at the sun that was so bright; phosphorous yellow. So bright it hummed, zinged, throbbed in the sky. I looked up directly into the sun ignoring all tales that I would go blind. I knew in that moment that I always needed to live my life being able to do this. I loved balancing, looking up at the sun, smelling the summer; cut grass, flowers and roses. I loved the smell of roses. I knew that when I grew up I wanted my own brick wall to separate me from the outside world; I wanted the suns warmth and the smell of pastel pink roses. I already knew at this age I was in the wrong body, I didn’t know I had a technical name, or that there was a way out of it. I just accepted being trapped, feeling wrong and knew that everything felt better when I was away from people balanced on a wall with my eyes closed, feeling the sun and smelling roses. When ever I came down from the wall I became clumsy, I never pleased anyone, especially my Father, the teachers at school, the boys at school, the football team, the neighbours, my brothers. I always got it wrong for them. Never being believable, being accepted. I worked hard for the crumbs of acceptance I did get. I saw the film Cleopatra when I was about thirteen and was transfixed, stunned by her entrance into Rome on the black Sphinx. I knew it was a film, a set, an extravagance and I didn’t want to be part of it but had a dream that I was there in the set, in Rome, all the actors including Richard and Liz were frozen, not statues just frozen still, allowing me to run around the set and climb the stairs of the Sphinx, lay back and feel the sun on my face. It was silent when I lay there feeling the sun so close; I was on a gods chariot. A gentle breeze slide across my cheek. I always loved California even before I know it had a name. I once remade my own Cleopatra. All my family, brothers, cousins, aunts, uncles supported West Ham football club, I didn’t really care. But they all wore the outfits, strips, when all I wanted to do was lay in the sun, the Californian sun. But one day they gave me a West Ham scarf to wear. There is one photograph of me from the 1970’s standing in front of our fireplace, flanked by my brothers and some artistic pasta sprayed gold. I am wearing the scarf tied loosely around my waist, the ends neatly trailing down to the floor. An exact copy of Cleopatra’s outfit when she entered Rome. What did I once imagine? I imagined it would always be sunny, I would always smell roses and I could run around California dressed as Cleopatra. All I needed to do was keep my eyes closed tight and this would all happen.
We got a grant from the Open Society Institute to hold the show in Bangladesh and in the U.S.A. The funding also included money to make posters that we hoped human rights organisations in Bangladesh would exhibit, but they all backed out at the last minute.
You find yourself at home,
The Dead Celebs Mystery Series
160 ml Peanut Oil (100 ml Olive Oil recommended by author)
I will however keep you up-to-date on his progress.
Like a lot of kids, I always wanted a pony; maybe this is my Freudian way of getting one.
My amazingly beautiful friend J’Nette offered to drive me to the airport where, besides the angry man who wanted me to let him go first in line…just because, it went smoothly.
How to Get the Best Paper Shredder For Your Money
Pack... what the hell pack number are we on?? 21??
Of course I didn't know the answer - I hadn't even heard the question. Only that dad had told me to raise my hands and stay engaged.
can’t be arsed to research. He may, just, be right lgally but not morally. Who knows without serious academic research. I would though guess that the matter could very quickly be legally fixed – otherwise we face anarchy. Oops – we had that last year"-Bewick.
– Before we are pregnant we dream of conceiving.
1 premature
Considering it takes place only once in a month, alternating at Festival Centre and Times Square Centre, its a pretty great place to pick up some random “junk”. Maybe you’re looking for a thoughtful yet different gift (the batman cushion for a comic junkie?), a quirky painting to adorn that blank wall at home, scented and decorative candles that could make your bathroom (or any other room) smell heavenly, some chunky jewellery or even a funky sock monkey to plop on your bed – the art fair is an interesting visit that would only take an hour or two of your day and what’s better is that its always on a Friday!
If you, like me, have a penchant for old school photos, I can thoroughly recommend a visit to this edition of Alan Burnett's Sepia Saturday, where this week's charming image prompt depicts a group of young lads on a break from class, being asked to "Look up" by the photographer. A couple of them did! The rest ... well, they did what all school boys do when asked en masse to pose for a school photograph.
Live a life for Him, put Him first in your life and everything else will come. Try to eliminate distractions from your life that may deter His plan for YOU. You’ll quickly realize, the joy you’ve been getting from the temporary successes is only a fraction of joy you’ll experience, compared to living a life for Him, where you can begin to have ever-lasting successes.
Today, it takes a miracle to change the balance in our Parliamentary system.
I wish I had an artist's brain,
Obama: Catchy, isn't it?
The strange man on his way out pointed to the millstone mortar, "That is worth more than you could dream."
Okay, I feel better now that I have made light of my situation and entertained myself to no end with the mental image of Indian Jones saving the prospective buyers. I guess I will un-wad the day and march on!
Other Arab media have also shown the same reaction. They published articles and editorials with bombastic and insolent language, attacking Iranian people and officials in an impudent way.
As the heat was oppressive, very few people were in the Off Road Vehicle Area. That almost made the heat worth it.
In the remaining part of this article I will comment on the various arguments in support of President Obama’s eligibility. As this runs to some length, the article continues on Sarah Maid of Albion II.
I headed to the gynaecology department hoping for better luck there. I
Have a lovely day y'all!
In August 2000, Veronique was attending an Indian classical dance workshop in the south of France, in Rodez, when she felt the inexplicable need to rush to a nearby cathedral and light a candle for Collins.
I realize big sound will never come from a tiny speaker, but still, I keep hoping. Something to plug into my iPhone or laptop. Anything that is ridiculously small, lightweight, sounds good, and doesn't cost me a fortune.
This is a shirt that my husband got me from a local big box store. I had to jazz up the kitty’s glasses with glitter fabric paint and bling. I also painted a little color in the kitty’s eyes.
Another cash saver is to forgo the tradition known as “Friends and Family,” the trial run a restaurant hosts prior to an official opening: “It might as well be referred to as ‘enemies and detractors,’ because no matter how much you like these people or think you value their sagacity when it comes to your food, the second they start eating for free and offering opinions, you realize how much you’d rather just line them up in the street and shoot them in the f--king head . . . I’m all about rehearsing on paying customers these days.”
(I bet they'd have better music after dinner...)
Schrader SM, Breitenstein MJ, Clark JC, Lowe BD, Turner TW. Erectile Function of Bicycling Police Officers.J Andrology 2001; (Suppl.): 135.
The most searched topic on my blog is "kitchen." The question I hear most often from blog readers, family and friends alike is "How is the Kitchen coming?" So, I thought it was only logical that my post for this year's Bungalow Blog Tour would be concerning my kitchen progress.
In contrast, consider the attention that the Western media has devoted to a lone blind Chinese human rights lawyer, Chen Guangcheng, who managed to escape from house arrest in Beijing a few days ago and find a safe haven at the U.S. Embassy. This is an important international incident, to be sure, but is it truly so much more significant than the Palestinian story as to explain the total neglect of the extraordinary exploits of these thousands of Palestinians who are sacrificing their bodies, quite possibly their lives, to nonviolently protest severe mistreatment in the Israeli prison system.? Except among their countrymen, and to some extent the region, these many thousand Palestinian prisoners have been languishing within an opaque black box ever ever since 1967, are denied protection, exist without rights, and cope as best they can without even the acknowledgement of their plight.
Schedule: April 17 to mid-October 2012
We sowed our spawn in the world’s dim dawn,
3 expensive
Thank you, Nancy for your excellent advice. I am going to stop feeling discouraged about all my mistakes...I know I am learning from every one of them!
Tomorrow, I hope to play golf if the wind dies down. Our temps have been in the low to mid 60s the past couple of days and last night and tonight the low is in the mid 30s. But tomorrow it should warm up again and our lows will be in the mid 40s. However the weekend our forecast is for some rain. We will see if that develops.
And I'm right again.
i don't have to ask for permission
And not only does Skype have a video call integration feature on Facebook, but the entire Humoticons campaign is housed on a Facebook page. Do we really need to mimic emoticons to put the humanity back in our conversations?
Nona/Peeple Watchin' - Split 7" will be released on 7" in March, 2012 by Get Better Records, Behind Punk Records, Square of Opposition and My Parents' Records. Preorder info coming soon. Stay tuned!
“Just like the world’s greatest athletes, children need to keep their skills sharp and reading is like any other skill - it needs to be practiced,” said Francie Alexander, Chief Academic Officer at Scholastic. “Without this practice, children find themselves falling down the “Summer Slide,” and that is not the fun slide at the park, but rather the loss of critical learning and reading skills caused by not reading books over the summer.” Francie continued, “The proven way to get kids reading is to put them in charge of their own reading – let them choose the books they want to read, when they want to read, and how they want to read – whether in print or digitally. It is the win-win summer reading solution.”
When the priests of Nanea’s temple had displayed the treasures and Antiochus with a few attendants had come inside the wall of the temple precincts, the priests locked the temple as soon as he entered.
WWE Title match is up now, John Cena Vs Alberto Del Rio. So yes, CM Punk is main evening this PPV.
One of the main reasons that individuals resist accepting this gift is the erroneous concept that you are going to be controlled by the Holy Spirit like a puppet. Nothing could be further from the truth. The Holy Spirit values your freedom even more than you do. You see the true agape Love He desires in you can only be derived from a free spirit – otherwise it is not agape Love. What the Holy Spirit is seeking is your freely given cooperation, in Love, so that He may inspire you to freely open yourself to what He is giving you. When you do, He gives you an uplift in your spirit that brings you a joy and peace that is beyond understanding and you also experience the intimacy of the presence of God in your hearts. It is this, His presence in you, which fills you and satisfies the longing of your spirit, for this, the purpose for which we were created.
gainst the United States since I have been a citizen thereof; that I have
I was using my 16-35mm wide-angle lens, usually a no-no for portraiture, as it tends to distort features unnaturally (especially up-close, where it can make noses bloom and hairlines recede). However in this instance, I kept really close to the rock but not so close to my subject, A., who stayed in the middle distance (which for that lens is about 5-10 feet away). The effect was to keep A. fairly well proportioned, but blow the rock right out, filling the frame, stretching it and (at closest range) blurring it. Oddly, this actually gave the impression of movement through the image, and making the frozen twists and boils of the rock appear fluid, another nice contrast. With A.’s hair catching a sniff of sea breeze, it gave an overall impression of motion and dynamism to an otherwise static scene- almost like a breaking wave frozen in time.
(original work of the author. Copyright)
The organization offers a horticultural training program that teaches would-be small farmers to do raised-bed French intensive organic gardening. Local people with no or little income who are sitting on a wealth of family land can put their inheritance to good use, with the market for their wares provided by Foothills Connect’s Web-based ordering system.
I had the tremendous opportunity to interview the author of this wonderful book.
It's an illness.
I have gotten another haircut.
How do I feel like there just was not enough time, when the Lord says there is a time for everything.
It is known that Merrill Lynch had OTC exposure of $22 Trillion. So, in shifting these contracts from Merrill to Bank of America, they are making YOU, THE AMERICAN TAXPAYER the de facto guarantor of these contracts. YOU ARE NOW THE "EXCHANGE". If the counterparties on these OTC contracts default, Bank of America will have recourse to turn to the FDIC to "bail them out". Where does the FDIC get its money? From the United States Treasury.
I don't actually consider this a bad thing since it's inconsequential and I don't go around knocking people off bikes just for the sheer @$$holery so I feel like I have the right to enjoy the slight annoyance that everyone is feeling right now. Also, MUAHAHAHAH! !
These activities of Friso have never been published by Dutch media outlets and have only become known through the website of Wolfensohn & Company short business biography of Friso. (click: “Investment team” and then “Friso van Oranje” through link provided). The same applies to Friso’s co-foundership of MRI Centre that excels in body scanning-techniques for the medical sector.
Here's what's on our bookshelf this week:
I wonder what other ARVO attendees think about these issues!
‘The motives behind this enterprise, therefore, seem more political than educational,’ warned a letter from the British Embassy in Washington.
Oh, come on! Is it really that big of a deal? Well, I guess it is. The guy they hire, named Mo, is some reject from a Flannery O’Connor story or something, who constantly talks in a fake Southern accent and spouts out stupid lines. Don’t believe me? Well, when one of the hoary old businessmen says “You can’t be as stupid as you look,” Mo responds by saying:
Government/Morality – Living Expression as Directive Principle Equality and Oneness
- Goat cheese/sour cherry ice cream with Panil Barriquee Flanders Red ale (triple fermented: steel tank, cognac barrel & bottle)
You heard it here first: This is the year Phil Smith goes down in the Lowell City Tournament. Six in a row broke Parigian’s record last year, so Phil’s motivation has got to be low. His family is taking up more of his time and there are some young guns out there who have him in their sights. But I think it will be one of the veterans who gets the job done. Dates for the Cities: June 27 Vesper, June 29 Mt. Pleasant, June 30 Long Meadow…
An old saying goes – People don’t leave organizations, they leave managers. If a business wants its people to make a lot of money for them, then it must set high standards and give employees something they can get excited about. These employees must be managed by someone who is trustworthy, cares about people as well as the business, and acts with integrity. Managers should not do anything special, but do exactly the same things that would excite and motivate them as individuals. As HR professionals it is necessary to create an open door policy so that managers can be accessible to their team members at all times.
for my celebration. Hmmm. I don't know what she has
This week has been really weird after Christmas. With all that’s led up to new years and we just get to sit at home. It’s a rule that we can’t go out for New Year’s. That does mean however that we get to stop working at 6. For us here in the office that means a full day pday again. We’re going to watch Rango and the Blind Side tonight…..probably in Portuguese which is less fun than one would think. Movies just aren’t as cool when you are seeing them dubbed over. Because you expecting to hear one voice and another comes out. It’s weird but It nice to know that when I can get back I can bore you guys by asking you guys to put on Portuguese subtitles. So start practicing hehe. Once again it’s raining and what can you do. Its weird how missionaries just get to the point where rain and other things just go unnoticed.
2 tablespoons butter/margarine
Fifteen-year-old Rae Kerrigan never questioned her family’s history. That is until she accepted a scholarship to Guilder Boarding School in England. Guilder is an exclusive, gifted school. Rae has no idea what she is getting herself into or that her family’s past is going to come back and taunt her.
While my ‘career’ progressed to alarming kids all over the country, and quite frequently mutilating selected works of Shakespeare, in a variety of ghastly Theatre In Education productions, Tod’s took him onto the silver screen where he could rightly shine as the nefarious star he was, and in film he was as theatrical and larger than life as on stage. With a blithe disregard for the change in form Tod commendably continued ACTING (I think his style warrants the capital letters) as only he could.
We're talking the CMV, and we're talking the Polyoma.
This month I think:
When INS Tanin, the new super-Dolphin submarine Israel took delivery of this week, finishes its sea trials and goes operational some time next year, the Israeli Navy will be able to station a nuclear-armed submarine in the Arabian Gulf full time. That should worry Iran’s rulers a lot more than all the talk coming out of the United States and Israel telling the ayatollahs to abandon their plans to build nuclear weapons.
Kahlil Gibran, the Lebanese-American poet (and my favorite), wrote: "When you are sorrowful look again in your heart, and you shall see that in truth you are weeping for that which has been your delight."
(Wendy Lamb Books, an imprint of Random House Children’s Books)
Tonight, I am the rock in the stream.
By Damon Rose – BBC News
say he won in the South and pivot to
244And low-brow'd rocks hang nodding o'er the deeps.
Let your heart be at peace.
3. A green-and-white-themed garden filled with camellias, a tea olive hedge, hostas, hydrangeas, and ferns.
Ketsanee Seehamongkol
Sameera Chatfield, the supervisor who helped the young “layaway angel,” an anonymous shopper who pays off layaways for strangers — a recent trend occurring at Kmart stores nationwide — said the boy walked in with his mom and specifically requested an account that included toys for boys.
Gregory: What’s wrong with Mittens?
Josephus was a Jewish historian who was born around AD 38. He served Roman commander Vespasian in Jerusalem until the city’s destruction in AD 70. Josephus personally believed Vespasian to be Israel’s promised Messiah. When Vespasian later became emperor of Rome, Josephus served under him as court historian. 2 In AD 93, Josephus finished his work Antiquities of the Jews in which at least three passages specifically confirm portions of Scripture:
Since dogmatics makes constant use of the miraculous, by definition an event without historical analogy, it cannot match the historical method in its appeal to the Modern Age. Dogmatics’ appeal to history is no appeal at all as the type of events claimed as history are not events capable of analogizing, removing itself from the criticism of the historical method. Thus, only claims of historical fact developed through the historical method are rightly called knowledge.
When you’re homeschooling year round, the learning never stops. Even if you start out planning to homeschool with more of a traditional schedule, you tend to find that homeschooling eventually starts to become ‘how you live‘ rather than ‘something you do‘. There is a learning opportunity in nearly everything that you do with your children. Most homeschooling parents are extremely conscious of the enormity of the responsibility that is on their shoulders and they take it quite seriously. They actively seek educational application in the mundane activities of everyday life.
Sleep. Its over rated right? RIGHT?? Ok, don't answer that.
Ehrlich, who was described as alarmist in the 1970s but who says most of his predictions have proved correct, says he was gloomy about humanity's ability to feed over 9 billion people. "We have 1 billion people hungry now and we are going to add 2.5 billion. They are going to have to be fed on more marginal land, from water that is purified more or transported further, we're going to have disproportionate impacts on how we feed people from the population increase itself," he said.
Thanks to my friend “Voice of the Trailer” for nominating this week’s BWA. Viki Knox certainly earns the great dishonor with her homophobic comments on Facebook. Knox, a public school teacher in New Jersey, demonstrated how LGBT youth are bullied by those in power–the teachers that are charged with educating and protecting.
The first course is from Chef Ned Elliott from Foreign and Domestic. It is Richardson Farms pork liver custard with piquillo syrup, natsturtium salsa, and sherry caramel. The flavor combination was utterly fantastic, and the texture of the custard was incredibly smooth. If you're a lover of the liver, this is the dish for you. If you're not a liver lover, you might not be so thrilled. While I loved the dish, I thought that the La Spinetta Moscato made the pairing overly sweet. I think a dry champagne would have paired better with the texture and sweetness of this dish.
Hmmm gee, I wonder why that is? Could it be all that “misinformation” that we are spreading far and wide? Alas, I don’t think its people ‘waking up’. Instead it’s purely experience; people watching children ‘change’ after receiving a round of vaccines. Though there are alot cases where the child is obviously exhibiting signs of a reaction to vaccines, the parent is either unaware or adamantly against the idea that vaccines could’ve done anything wrong.
Yesterday was Greatmother Geyah’s birthday, so I made a short trip back to Nagrand to go see her. The folks back in Garadar were giving her a birthday party, and it was good to see everybody, other than Greatmother feeling the need (yet again) to tell everyone the story about the time when I was a little kid when I was climbing a tree, and got up to one of the higher branches but slipped, but my pants got caught on the branch while I was starting to fall, and as I fell the pants got yanked down around my ankles, and so I was just hanging upside down there with my pants around my ankles and the branch hooked between my feet, and I was just stuck dangling there for a while, and, commando even then, so, you know. She always tells that story every chance she gets, because spirits forbid you let the fucking Warchief be taken seriously for a couple minutes. But she means well, and she’s getting up there and probably a little senile, so whatever.
sharing their crayons.
Natalie: One with a nice uniform, not knee socks like daddy's. A uniform that is black, blue, gold and red.
Whenever I see a car with a ‘Baby on Board’ sign hanging in the back window I wonder what reaction the driver expects from other roads users. Does the driver feel a sense of protection from displaying this small yellow diamond and declaring to all the dangerous and irresponsible drivers out on the road that this vehicle is now safe and immune to anything which may run into it?
Manga ~ Soulless Vol. 1: Artwork is complete. Chapter by chapter serialization (online subscription required) ongoing at YenPlus. Printed volume releases March 1. Have seen initial cover mock-up for Soulless Vol. 2 (AKA Changeless) and it is beyond fabulous!
I get Graeber's point, and its a good one as far as it goes. I also enjoyed Harris's examination of it: Voluntary "communism" can be good until it is wrecked by shameless freeloaders. Are there any examples of liberals seriously entertaining conservative ideas without the inevitable denigration?
The minute I found this candy cane biscotti recipe among my bookmarked items, I knew it was the one. I love Christmas cookies that are not only delicious, but look festive too, and these fit the bill on both accounts. Crushed candy canes are folded into a basic biscotti dough, and as they bake, the candy cane pieces melt and leave the biscotii studded with bright red specks. The cookies are buttery and rich, with hints of peppermint flavor thoughout. I loved them just as they were so it wasn't at all necessary, but for fun, I dipped a few in white chocolate and sprinkled them with extra candy cane pieces. The holiday season is all about excess, right?
1.Soak the Chana(black gram) overnight. Boil it adding a teaspoon of salt. Drain off water and keep aside.
Like his latter-day equivalent, Robert Rodriguez, he does it all: producing, writing, directing, editing, composing, and more. While his stories often flaunt the trappings of the information age, they’re usually firmly rooted in the wild west and pulps of old.
“Yes, and apparently marrying a man who hasn’t stopped trying to assault me since I was seven years old.” There was something of the little boy trapped behind his eyes. “Don’t ask me to do what I can’t do.”
Well just calling someone else heartless does not make you kind - it is your actions that will show it.
But as I write, no one is playing with the bubble wrap, carefully set aside for just the right occasion. Instead they’re doing music-theater with the florist’s water tubes salvaged from the bottom of the carnation stems.
I’ve written a piece for BornOffside about Roy Hodgson, who has this week been appointed as the new manager of the England football team.
Backwards step: New figures show that last year net lending fell by almost £11¿billion
Total: RM9.25
Sam knew Norbert’s family and their real estate, the land they owned, and all those sprawling Warner Center office parks and housing developments that old Dan O’Ryan built in the 1960s and 70s.
-Add the red pepper flake and basil and cook for another 1-2 minutes, until garlic is just barely starting to brown.
“Hmmmm…..and do you have sexual desires while riding your motorcycle?”
Wilson... is a toddler. Throwing tantrums, being sweet, needing naps still. Speaking of. It really is naptime. YAY!
(Optional) Cut (2) 13" x 8.5" piece of light weight fusible interfacing and iron on to the wrong sides of the back cover pieces. Serge or zig zag borders as well.
1 april
And now grown rich with plunder’d store,
atop your chest
I don't have a special set of flatware for the holidays; I use the same mismatched vintage silver forks, knives, and spoons all year round. But polishing makes even my everyday silver look new, and adds a sparkle and gleam to my holiday table.
This mistrust led to many problems, but it is the subsequent misunderstanding of human dominion over creation that I want to focus on this morning. Rejecting the divine order resulted in the mistaken belief that humanity’s dominion over creation means we can act however we choose in relation to the world. This perspective interprets dominion as domination and exploitation, which has been most clearly manifested in the way humanity has chosen to use the world’s resources. Let me explain by way of illustration.
There’s no good story without a villain. No villains here though because this isn’t just another story. It rather is Android history being made. And we don’t fool ourselves – both these superphones will be history next year, in the less dignified sense.
I had to include the eponymous Lee Kleinhelter nursery, even though everyone has seen it. The reason being that I have been so focused on its beautiful grasscloth, I kind of didn't notice the black or navy window treatments. Dark and bold statement....and functional blacking out for baby's sleep.
The global warming corpse is not quite dead, but dead enough for now. The question is what new fraud will the United Nations and environmental organizations perpetrate? The “acidification” of the world’s oceans? “Species extinction” or “Invasive species”? Be assured, the UN mafia is at work on something.
After a series of break-ins, patriarch Daniel beefs up his home security, installing security cameras all over the house equipped with motion sensors. These cameras provide the lens through which we will see most of the film, with brief asides provided from handheld home video shot by Kristi and Ali. This panoptic perspective gives us, the audience, a front row seat as events unfold.
Cal
man of sorrows
He had “tuned” the weapon for ease of operation and was still “tinkering” on it when he was shot.
Thursday’s VGM ruling saw the return of two cemeteries to the Beyoğlu Yüksek Kaldırım Ashkenazi Jewish Synagogue Foundation, as well as the repatriation of cemeteries belonging to the Beyoğlu Greek Orthodox Churches and Schools Foundation, the Balat Surp Hreştegabet Armenian Church and School Foundation, the Kadıköy Hemdat Israel Synagogue Foundation and the Kuzguncuk Beit Yaakov Ashkenazi Synagogue Foundation.
Pray for peace for me.
In 1965, the British Airports Authority was established and assumed ownership of Heathrow, Gatwick, Stansted and Prestwick airports.
Here I stand, damp and peeling
So....if you want to be considered for RAKs, post away ;-)
"OK", he said, "this is how it works, I climb the tree and shake it and the gorilla falls to the ground. The dog runs over and bites him in a vital spot. While he's disabled, you throw the net over him. I'll come down and we'll tie him up".
When ordering a Lone Star bottle, ask for the cap – underneath is a picture puzzle, which may spark conversation or simply allow you to waste time instead of watching little kids dance with all the best looking ladies.
on the banks of muscular fatigue.
As for comparing its human rights to other nations well sure we can do that till the cows come home, but that is just blurring the issue which is that of Cuba and its poor human rights record. Something that you try to blur by refering to other nations, maybe we could compare dental services across the Americas? Maybe as you said Cuba has fine dental services, after all I am sure that Fidel's torturers have some practice at removing of citizens teeth albeit with pliers!
Today, January 27, is the day that people in European countries usually commemorate the Holocaust. (In the U.S., as far as I have noticed, the Holocaust is commemorated on the day chosen by the Israeli Knesset and followed by Jewish communities - the 27 of Nisan, which this year falls on April 11). The date was chosen because on January 27, 1945, the Red Army liberated Auschwitz. Outside the Italian consulate in New York City today the names of the 8,600 Italian Jews rounded up and killed from 1938 to 1945 were read aloud by a variety of figures. The readers included the Cardinal Edward Egan of New York and some prominent rabbis.
Yesterday, when I was young......
You have a comfort zone which covers around about 10% either side of what you currently have in any area of your life. This can be in your relationships, your finances or your lifestyle.
One of the arguments usually trotted out by the anti cheap booze killjoys is to repeat the myth of preloading. That is to argue that cheap off trade alcohol is irresponsible because it is apparently common place for people these days to drink at home prior to heading for a night on the town. I have long considered this to be a weak and flawed argument, regardless of whether the activity is common or not.
The Skunks were four guys pulled together by guitarist Larry Lynne, aka Larry Ostricki of the western Milwaukee suburb of Waukesha. He brought in Rick Allen, aka Rick Sutherland, to play keyboards, Duane Lundy on drums, and Tony Kolp on sax. Playing on the band's name, Larry had everyone dye their hair black with a white stripe down the side. The band first appeared in 1964 at a place called Monreal's on 16th Street at National Avenue. The group went to Chicago to record some demos with the legendary Sonny Boy Williamson sitting in on harmonica, but those recordings were never released. A couple of changes were made, with Rick Allen replaced by Jack Tappy on bass, and Duane Lundy replaced by Teddy Peplinski on drums. The band moved about 100 blocks west to a place called Papa Joe's in Brookfield. Tony Kolp was then replaced by Randy Klein, playing rhythm guitar, and the band moved out to California. They played at a club called Gold Street in Garden Grove. They cut their first record on the Era label for release in November 1965. But the label's owner, Herb Newman, didn't like their name and changed it to The Unbelievables for that release. For their second single, the guys went to the Gold Star Studio and recorded their version of Elvira, along with the flip side, The Journey. The record wasn't released until the band moved back to Milwaukee.
Read-cache mode : Enabled
- Items, props, clothes, cars, books, images, people and dialogue are repeated over and over.
Angel Burn by L. A. Weatherly
At first glance, any new reader of this blog might assume I'm just ready to run at the drop of a hat. Let's visit my reality...I really do have four kids and a menagerie here. Almost everyday some issue comes up that reminds me I still have a lot to learn. Last week's mommy moment was quite an experience.
This ain’t no fetish
First of all, I'd like to say a big thank you to all of my new followers. You are what makes the world go round. Less than three weeks ago I had fifty followers, and now I have nearly a hundred and fifty awesome people following my blog! Thank you all for your support, your lovely comments and your own entertaining, interesting and fun blogs.
giggles and funny faces, enough so to warrant picture taking by passing bikers
before it thinks a word
And when the women had respect enough for themselves by excepting nothing more and settling for nothing less. We all need to go back to a better time.
Big Trouble in Little China (1986)
If I have faith mixed with belief I recognise the opportunities as they arrive
Highlights include drumming, dancing, singing, storytelling, and the sound of a solo flutist.
Lord Dormir: We couldn’t possibly be outside we were in the kitchen just a moment ago.
Shipyard Christmas
Cute right? I used a fat quarter that I bought for $1.27 at Walmart, some bias tape and some cloth for the backing. If you added it up, it probably cost $4 in materials!
I'm extremely grateful for Sarah's and Liz's hard work and enthusiasm--along with that of the entire Harper team. Special thanks to: Heike Schuessler, who designed the beautiful cover; Harriet Sands, Laura Fletcher, Oli Malcolm, Sarah Collett, and Tom Dunstan, who've been doing a terrific job with sales; likewise Catherine Friis, who made great things happen with international sales, marketing guru Liz Lambert; and publisher extraordinaire Kate Elton. Everyone has gone to great lengths to see that The Underside of Joy finds its across-the-Atlantic audience.
Have heard the splash, the forsaken cry,
Sources
I decided this was the perfect sketch to use as my card for my best friend's hubby as it wasn't too fussy and I carried on the 'simple' theme by using a lovely image from Tiddly Inks called 'Light My Life' which I thought was perfect for a man's card.
A mischievous girl who won't stay in one place.
One of the key findings of the study was that 95% of the time people with DVRs were watching live TV. Only 5% of the time were they watching time-shifted TV.
“The dead are dead, and that’s how they’re going to stay,” TSE Justice Silvia Cartagena said after learning of the Sala de lo Constitutional ruling.
News organizations, like Utah authorities, were trying to determine on Wednesday who had sent the letters and how the personal information of so many people had been exposed.
Thank you for all your nice comments yesterday. I was extremely proud of this cake and just had to share it with you. Let me know if you make it. It was honestly pretty easy to make. The hardest part was grating those damn carrots. Halfway through I realized I could probably use the blender. Oops. But by then I had already solicited Dan to grate and I was off the hook. Next time.
As the sun’s rays are bent when passing through a prism, so has the light of God been bent when passing through the hearts of men. Sin, temperament, prejudice, early education, cultural influences, prevailing vogues: all have worked to throw the eyes of the heart out of focus and distort the inward vision.
The greatest thing this film has to offer is a fantastic tracking shot of Fassbender jogging in NYC.
The study of language has been important in modern philosophy. Wittgenstein talked about the “bewitchment” of language. This is customary in public relations and advertising but in political propaganda it is manipulation not bewitchment. An example of how the elites try to change our thinking by changing our vocabulary was in The Sun online on January 14th. It reported that the government had published guidelines for the media suggesting some words and stories about non-white crime be dropped. Words to be suppressed: “immigrant,” “illegal immigrant,” “illegal asylum seeker,” “bogus asylum seeker,” “non-white,” “non-Christian,” “mixed race,” “half-caste,” “mulatto.” There is the substitution of euphemistic terms for those that reflect reality as in the official designation of “Anti-Islamic activity” for Muslim terrorists.
Juju - Medium brown/taupe shimmer
Guest blogging can be a lot of fun. You can meet fascinating new people and reach out to readers. I’m so grateful to the wonderful bloggers who have hosted me. I didn’t know all the ropes at first myself, so have to admit I’ve learned some of this stuff the embarrassing way.
We understand that this midwife was in a public hospital with a woman who had planned homebirth. After transfer of care to the hospital, the midwife continued in a supportive role with the woman: the usual practice in Australia when women transfer from planned home birth to hospital care.
Even though the S&P 500 index was slightly lower, the weekly survey of retail US investors was more optimistic this week than last. This is surprising since we usually see sentiment reflect market moves. Those expecting stock prices to be higher in 6 months rose to 29% (from 24.4%) while the bears decreased to 43% from 48%. The change was small but enough to push the bull ratio up to 40% from 34%.
Money that they doubtless regard as their rightful reward for loyally backing the corrupted Chief Minister, who has exploited the lands of their own people for so many decades.
The Samsung LN46B650 is an LCD flat panel HDTV that is second to none in terms of its superior quality. This device gives the consumer a superior viewing experience when it comes to watching programming, playing games or enjoying all of the other entertaining features supplied with the device. The LN46B650 is outfitted with a 1080p vertical resolution, progressive scanning abilities, a 120 Hertz refresh rate, and imagery that is so flawless and clear it brings all programming to life.
- go to the zoo
down Eglinton Hill melting ice-cream light
How would you describe Grayceon's music to someone that hasn't heard it?
We have generated an annual income of 33 million pesos for activities that have come out of our model, which has become a paradigm in the Conservation Economy of the Reserve.
Lately, the unconscious has been on my mind (no pun intended yet it is there, is it not? For the unconscious is ubiquitous despite one's forgetfulness or denial). Reading this book and having seen Inception (not as great as I had hoped), I guess I've thought more about the origins of dreams, their meanings, and the possibility of humans tapping into a collective unconscious.
With the event basically dead for nearly 35 years it will be interesting to see just how fast Powell can cover the distance. Using some basic math and calculating average speed over 100 yards and applying it to 100 meters, Charlie Greene’s 9.21 equates to 10.07 – very close to his actual PR of 10.02 set in the “68 Games in Mexico City. Using the same math principles Asafa Powell’s PR of 9.72 equates to 8.89 for 100 yards – a hefty improvement over 9.21. Similarly Tyson Gay’s AR 9.69 and Usain Bolt’s WR 9.58 convert to 8.86 and 8.76 respectively.
So we chalk it up to (more) adventures in parenting and move on. Forgive and forget.
IH was still housed at 40 Shaftesbury Avenue, just down the road from the evocative Berwick Street market and around the corner from the Blue Posts pub (the site of many well-lubricated lesson post-mortems). Finding your way around the warren of rooms that comprised IH almost required a course in its own right. Day 1 began with a welcome speech from IH’s co-founder, John Haycraft. It all felt a bit like drama school: we sat on the floor while John’s introduction involved a lot of what I would soon discover was a core technique on the course itself: he elicited.
First of all, any wine that can educate me on history wins in my book. Secondly, this wine tastes expensive, like I thought it should have cost me at least $15 (that is expensive to me). It has a bold flavor, but isn’t bitter, and has a really good aftertaste (or finish as they say?). In addition, their website was really cool and made me want to go to Chile to visit the Santa Rita vineyards and to pay my respect to the 120 patriots of Chile.
Final Fantasy IV 6
The walk we did is described here in detail by Martin Hesp with a downloadable guide. I can confirm that the views are stunning, even on an overcast day, and that the climb is very steep – both going up and coming down (obviously). As he says, on the return to Triscombe, you do indeed feel like walking should give way to flying (or sliding). It’s not entirely clear in the picture above, quite how steep the gradient was, but we did wonder whether we were actually on a path at all at that point.
And in the closing of some glorious day
austerity/living within our means
These events foreshadow the climactic event of the boy’s life, the death that marks the end of his childhood. Symbolically, Brautigan is also looking back on what he sees as America's age of innocence. The adults that he talks about – with perhaps the singular example of his mother and her obsessive fear of gas leaks – may have been impoverished but nevertheless they seemed content with simple pleasures:
As a result of the undercover investigation, Hassoun never posed any actual imminent danger, but his plea agreement makes clear that he intended to cause mass casualties and had rejected opportunities to walk away from the plot. He chose the particular location, in the 3500 block of North Clark Street, because it presented the opportunity to inflict a greater number of casualties than other locations he considered. There was a concert at Wrigley Field on Saturday night, September 18, 2010, just before he was arrested.
Chicken, Cheese, and Leek Jalousie
May God have mercy on the souls of those politicians who pretend to be Catholic in church, but in their public lives, rather like Judas Iscariot, betray Jesus Christ by how they vote and how they willingly cooperate with intrinsic evil.
To enter the Challenge, applicants must be aged 16 or above, entitled to work in the UK and available to work full time from 1 September 2012. The applicant must be looking to work in the creative industries, ie advertising and marketing communications, gaming and social gaming, publishing and TV/film.
This was built using the coil building technique. I hated it with a passion, and hate this piece as a result. It is nothing like I had designed. And just looks terrible, but I thought I would still through it up here for people to see (I have no clue why though…).
Omiyage-gifts go beyond the little souvenirs that you can find on any street corner in America. Although I did find some fabulous key rings from a Walgreens in Tucson that I used as tags on several gifts once that were a huge hit....
There is always the temptation to give a little less than everything. There is always the temptation to think that something is too trivial to offer to God as a sacrificial worship offering.
What gave it away was when psychologist Oskar Pfungst, who was part of a genuine thing called the Hans Commission, checked what happened when Hans couldn’t see the person asking the questions. The success rate plummeted. When he couldn’t read the increasing tension on people’s faces as he neared the right point to stop, and the relief and relaxation that swept over them when he got there, he was just a horse tapping his foot and hoping it would be good enough to earn him another salt lick.
Cross that desert to her!
But because they chose, because they wanted their degree - and the paths that lead away from that degree - the kids that I spent my time with were the kids who were poised to beat that statistic. I spent hours and hours with them in my basement domain, drilling them, foisting books on them, quizzing them, and generally annoying them to bits until they were ready to take the test.
As more time passes, we’re forced further down the skill axis from lack of playing or lack of interest due to our feelings about our in-game efficacy (that’s a another correspondence, dear reader, to be sent to you soon). We start feeling daunted by the height of the of the entry bar into raiding, and we start to have conflicting emotions about the game, whether it’s disappointment, burn out, or boredom. Then, we’re gone, and our quadrant continues to atrophy.
Will Cannabis Science (OTCBB: CBIS) start out the month of March being the Hot Penny Stock to Crash next?
Some say Dad was first to hear her screams, but was last to leave the house.
"We will continue to push for the names and positions of public servants involved in social grant fraud. It may very well be that the individuals involved are in senior positions and have significant influence over the system and databases," Walters
While there are so many other tips on safe driving I also have a small list here that I use regularly. This is a list of items I try to keep in my car at all times because I never know when I am going to break down, and how long it will take for someone to get there to help me.
So I guess we'd better have another round
* Could you tell us about the ethos behind Smart Quill Editorial and the kind of working relationship you aim to build between you and your clients?
The organizers (all animation industry folks) are really putting the talent center stage for the 2nd year in a row, 500 + years world class professional talent will converge for 3-days during “Animation Week” in Burbank Ca. CTN-X takes place at the Burbank Marriott Convention Center with ample discounted parking, conveniently located near the Burbank Airport and Amtrak Station. Early bird pricing and discounted rates are available to students and professional industry organizations. Join me and and make more connections in one weekend thenin a year on facebook at this very different event. Register now as my guest and save 10% on any 1-day or 3-day general pass by using this discount code as my guest HAFRX10.
Finally, one of my favourite publicity pictures of Lauren Bacall – one that looks as if it belongs to an Estee Lauder advertising campaign for a new lipstick ..
Which one of the books in the series was your favorite to write and why?
Next up: why session beer pisses off beer geeks.
Getting home from the Azores three weeks later than planned meant that I’ve had to cram the start of a new building project and catching up with five-weeks worth of office stuff into three and a half days before heading off to work at WOMAD for the weekend.
Initially it was the outer horror of the abduction that hit me. What can be more terrifying than realizing that you’re trapped somewhere with a stranger? You don’t yet know his motives, and you don’t want to guess at them because that would paralyze you. But you’re not alone. You’re best friend is with you – only he either doesn’t want to see the danger, or is still in denial.
15(For the LORD thy God is a jealous God among you) lest the anger of the LORD thy God be kindled against thee, and destroy thee from off the face of the earth.
Ariel wants Nick to meet her at her father’s lair if he wants Juliette alive. Nick picks up Monroe and they head off to save Juliette. Monroe astutely observes he’s putting his life on the line for a woman he’s never met. Monroe, it’s called using the Caller ID and not answering – try it some time.
I was pleased to see it is being taken well care of for a 52 year old house! It looks the same as when I lived there.
Ones made, and ones avoided.
Pull up a chair and grab a large mug of tea, a cup will never last the length of this post lol.
Funny, I had never even considered the third option but as I continue to grow in my spiritual path I find the third option, ACCEPTANCE, is often the most powerful, most effective, and most lasting. So many times I’ve thought I don’t have options in situations but now I realize I do have options, I certainly do! You have freedom but you may choose not to exercise that freedom.
wrapped with mohair yarn and dressed in tulle, handmade fabric and a hand-dyed silk ribbon
So, as you can tell by the subtle changes currently going on on the website, I posted this on the Native Appropriations facebook page earlier today, and readers had some less-than-nice words for the company. I commend Thunderbird for taking action to try and make their stuff less offensive, and clearly by editing it shows they've been made aware. But not totally aware, because a few readers sent them emails, and got variations on this response:
It added: ‘The arrival here of these students, many of them of indifferent academic calibre and ill-prepared for the venture, is likely to give rise to difficult problems.’
Energy consumption = (# gallons/mile)(30 kWh/gallon)(62 miles/100 km)
Is it being suggested by the SFA that Mr Whyte was not a “fit and proper person”, and as such RFC is in breach of the rules for allowing him to be Chairman?
Let us be open to the Holy Spirit this morning and let us respond to Him honestly and hope and love.
Pre-Christianity.
It caught on. On May 1st of 1867, the workers of Chicago implemented a general strike which brought the city’s economy to standstill for an entire week. In 1872, the building trades workers of NYC struck until they won the eight hour day. But despite national popular support, and a slew of toothless legislation aimed at pacifying the labor guilds, the 8 hour work day remained a dream for the majority of the population.
The investigation into Dr. Richard Verrette began in November when a detective with the Jacksonville Sheriff's Office began investigating several prescriptions.
screenshot at 445pm CDT 4/30/2012:
+ Feeling more angry, confused and sad than happy: This feeling usually arises when you think you can’t tolerate your partner anymore or vice versa. I’ve read so many stories of cases like this when the guy decides to break up with the girl for no reason, flirt with other girls, and then asks for forgiveness and repeats the same cycle. Often times, the woman tolerates all this because of the love she has for him and ends up feeling more angry, confused and sad than happy. Usually, the best solution is to abandon this sort of relationship. Honestly, you can do better. No one should have to go through this.
The ‘Scramble for Africa’ continues
“Because I work from home. I only have to go in a couple or so times a month for meetings. Most of what I do I can do from home.” Blaine said as his game was starting. “Can I play in peace now?”
The police custody sergeant probably has the most difficult job in UK policing. In my humble view, it is more demanding than being a ‘duty inspector’ where you are responsible for almost everything going on. A constitutionally significant role, it is recognised as a quasi-judicial authority for the purposes of the European Convention on Human Rights.
We didn’t speak during the rest of the trip up the elevator to the eighteenth level.
All right.
Ok so here's the other side of the story. Guy is at a bar and gets rip roaring drunk and accidentally staggers on to the dance floor, trips and grabs at a nearby girl's arm in order to steady himself. The girl is actually insane and turns on said drunken fool and begins to punch him senseless, even as he is falling to the ground. His poor friends come running over to his defense shouting "Stop! He was just falling! Please stop! He was just falling!"
the milk with soy or almond milk
(And yes....I was out there, too - looking like the Michelin woman...
Fireworks: Launch Orange Fireworks
So...on to the next. If I want to work on the computer, I have to remove these glasses, because yes, they're lovey, but I can't navigate the computer screen, because the eyeballs are battling each other for control, resulting in a blurry mess. It does work if a close one eye, but that makes me feel like a pirate, and frankly that weirds me out a little. I then remove the pretty, pretty, glam, glam, and switch to my 10 year old glasses. They used to be in style....but dang they're functional, and I can work on my computer forever. In fact, I'm wearing them now. Who cares if my cats think I look like dweeb?
From Randy Ingermanson:
Once again, if you drink beer, this is what people in any sort of power think of you, regardless of what beer you may drink.
Thanks for stopping by and I hope to see some of your cards in the HYCCT gallery!
It had to have taken hours for Belinkie to find all of the parts and put them together. I mean it’s 40 different speeches that’s a lot of video to go through and edit. Not to mention finding all the different parts and put them together to form a coherent speech. Now that is inspirational.
Click on the gallery above to see photos of the preparations.
goodbyes and good daylight.
-roll up by Layla but no count.
Since 2010 I’ve felt these energies more in my spine, the left side of my head, and my Crown and Brow chakras. With the start of 2011, these solar transmissions caused my entire head, skull, eyes, jaw and into my sinuses to hurt and feel bruised and sore constantly. There were many months in 2011 when the pain was focused primarily on the right (from the old 3D system of duality–male) side of my head. Eventually the head pain and pressure was everywhere and would move from the whole head to an area on the right side, then back to the left side, then to the back of my head and neck, then to the top, then the front and down into the forehead and Brow chakra. I could feel my Pituitary being changed and connected, Rewired, in more complex ways with my Pineal and other brain glands. Literally our two brain halves have been Rewired to function as a (from the new 5D system of polarity integration and resolution) unified organ. Along with that our Pineal and Pituitary glands are being Rewired, connected, evolved into far more complex unified systems that can perceive much, much more.
Christ has offered us a new life through His death and resurrection. We are to die to sin, be buried with Christ in baptism, and walk in newness of life. If the Spirit of God is dwelling in our hearts, we will be changed.
Did I mention that I loooooove PIVOT POINT??? Um, because I do. And HA! I’ve even read the sequel (which is also awesome, but let’s not go there right now).
As the Northern Hemisphere are shivering in their boots (lol!) we here in South Africa are experiencing extremely hot temperatures.
By painstakingly cementing an ardent emotional attachment to the medium in his innocent viewers, he groomed us for a lifetime of exploitation.
Remember the purpose
first and then switched to a spatula.
homeless people are received with loving arms and open borders
To start with, a canton system, as in Switzerland, can be created between Afrikaners and the coloured tribes, which can develop into independent states for white and brown later… but definitely without any black interference.
I mean for god's sake apparently we're not even allowed to say Baa Baa BLACK sheep anymore it's supposed to be 'coloured' sheep. Forgive me for saying so but that's just bullshit and also I'm pretty sure we went through a whole period of history where 'coloured' was an insulting term for black people so how flipping confusing is that. There really are black sheep people get over it - it's not racism.
Rajesh asked, If an existing tenured employee has completed 2 yrs. with an org’n and its been only an year since you have joined, being at the same level though your performance has been superior, can you demand for a promotion..
It is not all about the music business, musicians and bands need to have that foundation in their art, their songs, their creativity and the love of the dream and the goals they have. However, if this is more than a hobby and more than a part time thing, the music business side of things does have to take a big role.
If you use a bundt pan, bake for about 30 minutes. If you use smaller cake pans, reduce your time a little more (I baked a 4" cake pan for 15 minutes). Follow the rule of thumb to remove from oven when an inserted toothpick comes out clean.
Occupational Therapist Tamasine Spaeth of the Mental Health Day Hospital in Paisley’s Royal Alexandria Hospital was inspired by a 2009 BBC2 documentary “Wonderland: the Alzheimer’s Choir” and this film showed people with dementia singing with relatives and friends in a Singing for the Brain group in the South West of England. Group members told how, through the singing, they had experienced social, emotional and physical benefits. “From the moment I saw the documentary I was determined to set up something similar in Renfrewshire,” said Tamasine. “I found the documentary incredibly uplifting because it showed people with dementia and their families having a good time together and making friends in a natural way. People were happy and animated. It was difficult to tell who had dementia and who didn’t. I also wept because it was such a far cry from my own experiences many years ago, when I visited my father on locked psychiatric wards. He developed dementia in his early 50’s and very quickly lost his job, his freedom and eventually his speech. I still have vivid memories of standing awkwardly in the large, bleak, empty wards, not knowing how to ‘be’ with him, yet wanting so much to make contact. I wept because I wished there had been a group like this for me and my father.
One glance at the menu shows that the prices are a bit higher than what I am accustomed to for brunch. On top of that, there are separate public holiday and Sunday prices which are marginally higher; thankfully it’s a Saturday so we are not subject to these prices. We proceed to order our dishes but they’re a bit slow to come out – it takes over half an hour for our orders to come through. Despite this, I have to commend them on their very attentive service.
Cline said she hadn't located the correct citation.
- That I no longer have my list of links to your blogs! My reader is gone. So leave a comment, if you would - so that I can rediscover your blog feed. Or, I could discover it for the first time. Thanks.
We live in an American culture where it is fashionable to make Jesus everything you want Him to be. Unfortunately, the Jesus of too many American’s, and Christians none-the-less, is not the Jesus presented in the Bible. If the Burger King slogan “Have it Your Way” were to have a Christological bent, then the slogan for the Jesus of America would be “Jesus, Have Him Your Way.”
4. Potato Pack say bye bye blemishes.
For a short time, she settled with seven of her virgins at the foot of Croghan Hill. Around the year 468, she followed Mel of Armagh to Meath. She founded a monastery at Cill-Dara (Kildare) and was Abbess of the convent, the first in Ireland. The monestary developed into a center of learning and spirituality, and around it grew up the Cathedral city of Kildare. She started a school of art and its illuminated manuscripts became famous, most notably the Book of Kildare, which was praised as one of the finest of all illuminated Irish manuscripts before its disappearance three centuries ago.
oh, and Angie...our beautiful, smart, compassionate nurse, I would be a crazy person without you. Thanks for being my silent partner in crime :) xoxoxo
I look around and spot Freddie Mercury’s smiling face -
Flipped by Wendelin Van Draanen
I am spraying across the range
10. . . still wear normal clothes, nothing designer. Those prices are just stupid! Regular stores carry very cute stuff, sometimes on sale. (How is it possible we adore these idiots who waste so much money on a single trip down the red carpet? Are we all crazy?!)
“Get out of my way.” He almost did not recognize his own voice. It was a deep, raspy growl. “The Wall’s” eyes widened, but he did not back down.
As if that were not enough, I have spent the week writing posts for a blog tour, answering several Q&As, written a Top Ten list of horror short stories for the Guardian website and written a short piece for the TES.
Kelly is one of the kids in the special needs program. She spends some of her day a few times each week in Teagan's classroom.
"Thank you, Mr Worf." I answer, but before he can say anything, his wife Jadzia Dax whisks him on to the dancefloor where the Okey Cokey is just starting up. Worf looks annoyed at this, and I can lip read his protest to Jadzia that "A Klingon warrior does not do the Okey Cokey!"
Just go and look at WRH today. I don't think the page has ever looked worse. Every story is such a travesty. One wonders how on earth it got so bad. Like going to sleep with a mouth full of chewing gum. The damage done. On to the next one. My entire body closing down as the 57 trillion cells that I call me, sense the rest of its body's slaughter and heartache. I feel it to the core.
They answered: “O mighty Tsar Saltan! we have truly visited many countries and seen many strange things, but the most wonderful is this. When we were thy guests before, we told thee of an island on which, bare and uninhabited of old, we found a splendid Palace with a beautiful Tsaritsa and a brave Tsarevitch. On this sailing we passed again that way and put in at the island, and now beside the Palace of white stone there is a green garden with a mill that grinds and winnows of itself and casts the chaff a hundred versts away. Beside it is a golden column on which a cat climbs continually up and down, singing songs and telling tales. And there is a summer-house of crystal in which the cat lives. The Tsaritsa showed us these wonders and her son the Tsarevitch Guidon sends a greeting to thee.”
This is a gorgeous cookbook. The recipes are simple, delicious-looking, and so easy to follow with their step-by-step pictures (all taken by Ree). What a huge project this must have been for her to complete.
By “élite” dramatically changing lifestyle. It has allways been like this and street art Will just go were it is heading…
Well, it's been quite a week. By now you've all heard it, a volcano on Iceland with a name way too long to even try to write or pronounce, has erupted for the second time in a month this week. Flights in most northern European countries are canceled, including Denmark, Great Britain, Northern France, Germany etc. And it makes you wonder really, why it happened just now. My parents flew to London this week to start their trip to the Philippines, where they will be spending the first six months of their retirement.
Her poor hands were numb, frozen to the bone
piCture pOlish - Honey Dew
You know when you go shopping in a different city, just for a change of scenery? And you're not really all that familiar with your surroundings, but still manage to get out-noobed by the locals?
Authorities turned the evidence -- the tainted capsules -- over to J&J, where they were destroyed. Investigators then used that valuable time, early in the investigation while the evidence still existed, to go after people who were all later exonerated.
People started arriving at the offices in Woodside after the State Department of Labor and the union announced they were looking to hire iron and wood apprentices for 50 positions.
Nutbrook Same Again 4.5%
General Description:
pepper powder 1 tsp
The way my feet felt when I was done made me feel young again. I have honestly not had my feet feel this soft in years. When I hit thirty years old I felt like it all went down hill, my skin became dryer, my toe nails became thicker and now heart burn kicks in every time I eat something spicy..ohh
Small circles on your skin right? Each little portion finding its way clean. What about your body? Tell me about your skin. Do you touch yourself in the shower? What do you start with? What areas do you focus most on? Every answer you give rings another chord to my heart. I want to feel the water run off of your skin.
I've resisted a twitter account for years but with my new blog-venture I decided to create one. There's no denying twitter's usefulness for promoting and networking when you're blogging like (hopefully a whole lot of people) are reading.
Games are a great way to introduce fun and daring into a story. A casino setting called to my own gambler’s blood and love for the unknown. I hope you enjoy the dynamics between Rome and Sloane and their antics in Vegas. Some very private antics!
Above all this is the confusion that 'the folk who are in debt hold their heads as high as everyone else.' And that's one of the more interesting aspects for the modern reader, to consider when it was that everyone decided that credit was fine and the ability to pay it back almost secondary. Brú's keen sense of the shift between these two generations means that this novel manages to poke fun at both sides and that whilst the detail is entirely specific to a certain type of people in a certain place at a certain time he manages to say something to us today about the dangers of excess, of living beyond your means and where the true measure of self-worth and pride might be made.
This weekend, I got to see my friend Helen three days in a row! Friday night for the movie Five Year Engagement - it was funny and cute! Saturday night for the awesome Dodger's Game versus the Washington Nationals. The Dodgers came from behind in the 9th and then Matt Kemp's homer in the 10th inning won the game. Hella screams and shouts! Our seats were awesomeness - check these out! And on Sunday Helen hosted a brunch at her house!
1. God of War 3
You sit at the edge of the world,
Le Mans-winning designer Peter Elleray on the relationship between engine and chassis design, highlighting where their needs conflict
Remove from heat and sprinkle with some crushed peanuts and coriander leaves. You paneer is ready to eat. Mango powder gives it a tangy taste, which is balanced by the sugar and the chillies give the necessary heat. The peanuts add a crunch to the dish. It takes about 15 mins to get this dinner together.
Worst pack: Pack 4, as I'm no Kenny Britt fan, and hate Eli Manning, plus the rookies were meh
One could potentially champion O Brother Where Art Thou? As another more deserving film, but I won’t. I love it, and it makes me laugh, but it’s got a lot of problems.
Memorable Line: “I have been and always shall be your friend.”
Freydolf frowned. “You should have delayed your visit until afterward!”
The song was introduced in 1921 in the sketch “Mr. Gallagher and Mr. Shean in Egypt” so it was always done thereafter with the actors wearing fezes in front of a pyramid backdrop, though that became a non sequiter subsequently. The original version of the song was reportedly written by Bryan Foy of the 7 Little Foys in 1921 when Gallagher & Shean and the Foys were performing on the same bill at Keith’s Indianapolis. But the roots of the song go far deeper, back to minstrelsy, where there was a rich tradition of such back-and-forth two-man songs.
Anyway, for those of you who haven’t seen it already, check out Tim Burton’s Alice in Wonderland!
We had a great trip. Including several days in Estes National Park where we finally tracked down a herd of elk. We went from our elevation of 1200ft up to 12,000ft. and back down again. We were gone for 14 days.
On that very day he “Had a successful surgery on Zakia with Dr Mamoon Rasheed at @Shifa international Hospital Islamabad Pakistan”. Per his bio, Dr. Rasheed is also a plastic surgeon who first qualified in 1985.
beginning and end
Registration and Abstract Deadline: August 1, 2012
But before examining the parameters, it is worth looking at what these parameters represent. The CBI has produced what it calls “baseline” and “adverse” parameters and its press release says (my emphasis) “stress testing is used by banking supervisors to determine whether a bank is adequately capitalised to withstand adverse macro-economic events or unanticipated ‘shocks’. It is not an economic forecast: it employs hypothetical scenarios.” Whilst it is understandable that the adverse scenario is not a forecast, I would have expected the baseline scenario to indeed be a forecast. The press release from the CBI is woefully brief but if we go back to the now-discredited Committee of European Banking Supervisors (CEBS) stress tests last summer, we see that what they referred to as the benchmark scenario was indeed a forecast lifted from the “EU Commission Autumn 2009 forecast and the European Commission Interim Forecast in February 2010, with several adaptations to reflect recent macro-economic developments in a number of countries.” The adverse scenario was internally generated by the CEBS. So contrary to what the CBI says, it does indeed appear that the baseline scenario in the present tests is a forecast. I stand to be corrected on this and have asked the CBI for clarification.
Here's today's tune running through my head..
2 slipped
Doctor-approved stretches every AM/PM (I am dealing with spinal/lumbar issues).
When he first came his was very introverted and hesitant in his interactions with his nannies, but now he seems much more at ease. He seeks eye contact and asks to be held often.
I am so jealous. Tonight at midnight the much anticipated 3rd installment of the Twilight series hits the big screen. I wish my hubby wasn't on the damn night shift so we could see Eclipse. Instead he is slaving away at the jail as what I like to call an overpaid babysitter. I guess Bella, Edward, and Jacob will have to wait until tomorrow.
In our increasingly Web-oriented news cycle, readers need headlines that are clear and concise, ones that disclose as much information as possible. Without dropheads and the aesthetics of print, Web headlines cannot afford ambiguity. But here are some instances where question headlines are appropriate:
It’s not that I’m hiding out in here. It’s just
Racial quotas: In Malaysia, the issue of race discrimination is complicated. A little known constitutional article – Article 136 – states that all persons of whatever race in the same grade in the service of the Federation shall be treated impartially.
I took that plane and I soared with those angels
was able to flip the picture in PicassaWeb, so here you have it right side up, maybe.
Sierra Nevada Brewing Co. Sierra Nevada Porter
Tools: Martha Stewart deco fans edger punch
Instead of having idealistic, hot steamy sex and romantic dinners like the out-of-town lovers, with my out-of-state gal pals, we shop, we visit museums, see shows and plays, stay up well into the night making drinks, having funny and deep discussions and watching our favorite dvds. We’ll check out farmer’s markets and bookstores or check out local festivals and go to our favorite restaurants.
I believe a sinner, without being forgiven of sins, cannot be in the presence of God because he/she would burst into flames (Genesis 32:30). God is perfect so we must be perfect to be in His presence. Without the mediator we would perish (1 Timothy 2:5). Look what happened to Saul (now Paul) he was blinded by God's holy presence of light.
“Easy Baby, he’s injured” Allissa says as she half effortly tries to get Marin back, but Jonan nods her off.
Back when I used to "throw my back out" periodically -- before I learned the back exercises (really unattributed yoga, I learned later) that made those incredibly painful, disabling bouts a thing of the past -- it was the QL that I injured. So when I learned about it in massage school I was anxious to work with it.
No we didn't play at Sing Sing. We played at the block party of the Cavalry Church where a friend of Fati's is a member. We had our first groupie, my nephew Vincent along with us and the kids.
The plotline of DON'T BREATHE A WORD is superior to any other novel on teen homelessness. As someone in a middle-class family, it's hard to imagine that some of these things happen but Cupala makes it real. My favorite aspect was that this wasn't just a novel about homelessness or an abusive relationship. It was a novel about friendship, love, and what either of those actually means.
3.Unschooling is
What does Hazel get in return? We’re to think that David’s example softens her, but really, she never seemed that jaded or cynical to begin with. Check that: “I hate men” is pretty damn cynical, but the line reads comic (The Music Hall busted its collective gut) and Hazel is ever the good girl with standards. For her to fall in love with David seems natural, and the only dramatic tension in their relationship rests on the possibility that David’s big heart and lack of business sense will either starve or exhaust him into an early grave. Can Hazel, as David’s employee, save them both? Not on her own.
Cathie Rigby
The complex is located on Lake Margaret Drive near Dixie Belle Drive and the shooting happened at about 9:30 p.m.
ran warm (10:42-10:31), 5 mi @ 9:50; cool (10:31)
When ready to serve – stir in the fromage frais and reheat the soup gently, without letting it boil.
There’s not a line for the way Abbey turns back to catch my eye and shake her head in exasperation when Ryan misses a word in any of her beloved princess stories.
I don’t wanna be left
After all, I've watched the gay rights movement become more and more "mainstream", over the last 30 years. Over time society does seem to figure a lot out. With any luck we don't slip back into old, messed up ideas, like slavery and genocide (no guarantees tho - see recent post on global warming).
Ashlyn is a rock star! No drugs and a fierce determination to stick to her birth plan
I don’t want to be needed. I just want to be wanted. And I don’t need a good man. I just want one good man. If I am to follow anything, I’d far rather follow astrology. It seems to summarize the dynamics most succinctly and hey, if I have to take my chances on a book or any guidance, why not astrology? I don’t want a guy I have to play games with nor do I want a guy who does that to me. I get more out of reading astrological compatibility charts like this one:
According to an article in an old newspaper, Ada was involved in the local school. It was about the controversy of allowing five Japanese children to attend the public school. Some of the Eau Gallie citizens obviously didn't want them there, they should have their own school they cried. Ada voted to allow these five children to attend school with her son. I am so proud of my great grandmother and her decision to vote yes.
First, make sure you are qualified by a major lender first. Often you will have to be prequalified by another lender: Chase, Wells Fargo, Bank of America. Be prepared for this. The lender wants to make sure that you could qualify under their guidelines if the original lender cannot complete the transaction.
Walking on the Chinese Wall
Turns out the 49% part was right. I feel terrible.
To many in politics, and particularly on the Left, the county regiment system smacked of privilege, largely because the method by which we, on these islands, have raised fighting forces for a thousand years was outside state control. There was a unique mix of the sons of the gentry – and the Royal family – subsumed into an organisation with the sons of the middle classes, working classes and the poorest immigrants, all bound together by a badge for which they would die. But their success, often in the face of overwhelming odds, was down to banding together like Sir Andrew’s men in a manner no conscript could ever be taught.
“Sore throats, voice loss and breathlessness were the most common conditions reported, with one in ten saying their work is suffering due to stress placed on their vocal cords.”
I didn’t make the changes because the other strategy wasn’t working, I made the changes because it simplified things. The old way I had to keep track of when to check in, which could be at any time, and my schedule didn’t always permit it, which means I wasn’t checking in as often as I could, which means missed opportunities for both profit-taking and buy-ins, etc.
“You should come get me.”
I worked at a Juvenile Arthritis Conference in Phoenix.
The priest’s vocation is all about the fullness of the vocation of everyone else. The priest has a special call to discern and to direct those other vocations, so that the Church might be one, so that there might be one flock and one shepherd. So, the priest is as concerned about everybody else’s reception of the Grace of Christ, as his own. And, the priest has a very good motive for his concern about everyone else’s reception of God’s Grace, for Jesus Christ will hold him to account for that on Judgment Day.
So much fun for you and your kids!
Sassy xx
That is the intention, yes. I always use very small, sweet cameras. The fuji I used for the Sigur Rós book makes a very nice sound when you shoot with it. Almost like a toy camera. I am very intensively aware of the effects my camera has on the people I shoot photos of. That is one of the reasons why my employers often give me the "difficult" people to work with. Well, that is not too bad, because I like things to be challenging. John Lydon for example was a tough one, and recently David Attenborough wasn't exactly working along with me. While a few weeks before his brother Richard had been a real darling. All in all I got a good feeling out of it in the end. and besides: I prefer an honest bad temper over fake friendliness. Something that happens as well.
I raise an amused eyebrow. Greg’s talking about closing. Of course he is. Sort of a “coffee is for closers” kind of moment.
After surviving for over a year on between 2-4 hours of sleep each night, I think I finally reached my breaking point last week. No, I did not do anything to the baby, except for possibly have gotten her healthy enough that she can sleep through the night. For the past week I was so tired I could not think and barely functioned. But for the past couple nights, the baby has finally been getting sleep, which means I am getting sleep. She has been free of sickness for almost 2 weeks, which is the longest period of time for her since birth (over a year ago). And so last night I got, drumroll please, 7 hours of sleep. It felt heavenly and I awoke feeling energized.
A senior menu, portions right,
Also called the Cold Moon.
4. Use routines to keep clean going:
For salad:
The first thing that I noticed, coming out the other side;
In the meanwhile, the Nokia 808 PureView has also won the award for Best Imaging Innovation for 2012 from the Technical Image Press Association (TIPA). Jo Harlow, Head of Smart Devices at Nokia, spoke about the importance of the device in the entire smartphone industry, saying:
Yet those who wait for the LORD Will gain new strength; They will mount up with wings like eagles, They will run and not get tired, They will walk and not become weary. Isaiah 40:31
A digital & Printable Kit
Wow, I haven't been able to give either of my blogs much thought in the past month. I've said this before, but between apartment hunting, wedding planning, and my career... it's a bit busy. Apartment hunting is like taking on a second job. Every day I'm calling places, walking neighborhoods, and arranging appointments to view places. It doesn't help that the range of what's available for our price range is SO wide. You can never tell what you might get. Our expectations are also really high. We want a walkable neighborhood with at least one parking spot (two is better) and if there's only one spot, there needs to be ample street parking. That combo is so hard to come by. Our current neighborhood has that, but the apartments available are pretty lackluster. To make matters even more complicated, we really want the option of getting a dog when we're ready.
The present exclusive range of NEC phone means that people all over the nec multisync lcd 1760nx as Nippon Electric Limited became a partnership between these two gentlemen with the facilities personnel needed to ensure all processes are performed safely, completely and with Android operating system would be their main attraction at the nec multisync lcd 1810 can provide employees on an authentic supplier, invest time to talk about anything operating staff members. This particular software package will certainly permit every person to obtain a complete bunch of computer software. The software line will not be able to explain all this thoroughly and that will increase the nec multisync lcd 1525m driver of lenses to achieve high brightness projection solution will emerge. NEC to grow at a time.
I'm really proud about this tag... in this last period, I don't know why, I find a particular, special delight make tags; usually for Christmas I make a ton of cards, one after the other, every day cards, but this year, uhmmm, I don't know, I'm feeling in tag-mode, ahahah :D
The internets happy hookers will deny that their insistence has any consequences for anybody but themselves, and will say ‘No, we do not advocate prostitution for all women; only for those who choose to do it’. In saying so, they first deny the severity of the constraints behind those ‘choices’ for the vast majority of women. They then go on to ignore their insistence on a class of women who are made merchandise means that they insist all women are potential prostitutes, just as the cars in all of our driveways might one day be bought or sold, depending on fiscal constraints, because of their commodified status. This is what happens to women when they are reduced to the status of products and goods.
“You’re right, Tanner,” Hood concurred. “We already have all the elements of something really nasty to take place. Adding fuel to that fire, if you’ll allow me to mix my metaphors, can only make the situation worse.”
Jet Airliner
UPDATE: I emailed Boyfriend at work and I was like "If someone asked you the question 'uterus babies not sticking to?' how would you respond?"
After too many years of men and women working hard to buy everything they are supposed to want and need, up popped common sense to ask this question: "Why not work less and do more for myself so that I don't need so much money to live?" Could it be that simple? Living well on less, hmmm, it's got a good ring to it. Most of us have grown up with the idea that you must work to have the money to keep up with the Joneses and while that concept is the basis of our Western economies, I believe families have been short-changed by it. While our governments are saying that families are the centrepiece of the nation, they put the economy first; surely they should have equal footing. I’m not advocating we all give up work and stay home to mellow out but it shouldn’t be an all or nothing scenario. There should be an option for job sharing, part time work, two parents working at different times, working from home and home businesses. No one is telling us to cut our desires and expenses so we can give more time to family and to life. The emphasis is to build the economy, work longer, buy more, live in bigger houses and have “good debt”. Up until the second world war, before the days of credit cards and huge mortgages, we all lived very happily with less and by doing much of the work we now pay to have done for us. It's a vicious circle - we work to have the money to live well, but when we see all those things we want, we have to work more to pay for it all. We also spend more on food because we don't have the time to carefully prepare our own food. A quick burger or bucket of chicken may be handy at the end of a busy day but that and being tired and overworked is putting us in our graves too soon.
So there you have it my friends. Beck clearly crazy in October, by March he's just reading aloud from the New York Daily News as nut groups offer big money to drag a guy out in the street and kill him. And its not even spring yet.
It was not happy and started screeching loudly and angrily. I hadn’t got hold of it in the best way, so it had one wing free, which it flapped madly. Fortunately my hands were about half an inch out of pecking range.
Pictures!
Everyone take a moment to breathe that *sigh* of relief for not having to wait for subsequent books to finish the story.
Why? I was writing outside of my voice. I was Jack Black trying to play the lead in Deadwood.
8. That encounter still nags at me on a number of different levels. Miriam’s parents never answered my question: If I were white, would they still have accused me of hurting their daughter? My honor as a father and as a human being was totally disregarded. Two children had to experience the stupidity of their elders: Miriam’s parents for false accusations and racist words, and me for delivering veiled threats. I lost that day. I lost the core of the person who I am trying to become. I lost hope that my daughter would be able to live in a world where skin color wasn’t a factor. I lost faith that the rift between white and black folks could ever be repaired.
Sometimes I get wound up tighter than a drum. The reasons can be obvious or very illusive. I try at times to remember how I worked myself out of it pre-Dd and pre-marriage. I think that maybe I didn't.
Leave the link to your IMM and I'll check it out! I would LOVE to know what you guys are reading! And I'm sorry I've been M.I.A! My life has been pretty crazy, but I'm back now. I have some reviews written out and I'll post them later! Thanks for all of the comments on my reviews; I don't know if I replied to them or not... sorry! :( Thanks, guys!
If only I didn't keep having these contractions. . .
First, all three alleged plots are led by politicians who are very close to Iran. My assumption here is that since the premiership is going to stay within the Shiite house in general (since Iraqiya and the Kurds already got their share of the three top posts) Maliki drastically depreciated from Iran's perspective. After all, Tehran was at odds with Maliki since after he turned on Sadr 2008. The support Iran gave Maliki in the past few months was an exception to the rule. Now that the Shiite parties are more or less on the same side again, it makes sense for Iran to back a less nationalistic figure.
I am inspired by many, many things in this amazing world we live in. You know that American Beauty quote? "Sometimes there's so much beauty in the world I feel like I can't take it, like my heart's going to cave in." I truly feel that way sometimes. But if I had to narrow my list of inspirations down to just a few things, this would be it:
My initial idea was to make a ticket reward system to encourage my 12 year old to clean her room, pick up her toys and read a little extra each day. She is way too into playing on the computer and watching TV. Anyhow, that will still happen, but it didn't for this challenge. I was trying to get my fabric organized, when I found myself frustrated with all of my fabric scraps. I honestly didn't know what to do with them. AND then I had a "That's The Ticket" moment. I started to think hard and heavy about hexagons. And English paper piecing. Something I NEVER thought I would do. (Never say never, it'll turn around and bit you in the butt one day.) And now I have started using my scraps to make these:
1) Drain pineapple, reserving juice. Refrigerate pineapple.
The truth is that I don't think anyone noticed at first, and for a long while. I think that, when you've acted one way for a long time, people don't quite believe you when you start to change. It was during that time, when I was really struggling with that, that I wrote "Changing When You Can't." Because what I wanted to say, really, was "I'm TRYING. I'm really TRYING," and I wanted someone to see it and acknowledge it and say "I get it. Keep going, it's working." But nobody said that, and it was sometimes hard to keep going when I felt like nobody believed me.
My philosophical friend to whom I called to for some insight. After hearing me out, she said that in addition to visualizing, other things can help reinforce a positive outcome I desire. For example, I could keep a daily journal and write what I desire to have happen in my life. This is a very good way to keep my focus. Another technique is to make a collarge with images of what I want, along with good things that are part of it my dream. It could have photos from magazines or I can simply doodle/draw pictures. When my little poster is completed, I can put it somewhere I will see it frequently. Just seeing these visual suggestions regularly will stimulate my imagination.
Be neutral
Second in Simon Toyne odyssey about the mythical Citadel and The Sacrament. The Citadel is a fictional holy place in Turkey established virtually at the dawn of civilisation and which has guarded the secrets of The Sacrament since then. This book picks up exactly where Sanctus (vol 1) left off, which it had to as that book didn't exactly leave you on a cliffhanger but almost ended mid-sentance, let alone mid-scene - so in some respects I doubt you can pick this up and read it without having read Sanctus before hand.
The Poems
because I kept escaping from them
This is why our weekly goals list is something I cannot recommend more highly for those preparing for long-term travel. Each week, we set short- and long-term goals that require team or individual completion. We order them according to importance based on whether they impact other projects or deadlines. Then each day after work, we discuss the list and hunker down for a night of productivity.
HIS LOVE,….
The strange thing about working as a bike messenger is that you don't spend lots of time on your bike. Time is spent in elevators, waiting, moving, signing, dodging, but mostly thinking. In fact you have a surprising amount of time to think about your life and the world around you. It's like a mashup between an exercise routine, unemployment and social security. Low pay, no benefits, all the time in the world to think, but you get to go as fast as you want.
How soon succeeding eyes begin
to say the least :) I got quite down with what was happening in my life.
I looked at it and did a double take, realizing it was filthy. Then I said, “Hey, Holmes. I’m going to write on that vase.”
Today there aren't many foods that I can say I don't like. In fact, I have a rule where I cannot say I don't like a food unless I've tried it several times, prepared in different ways. I used to hate Thai food, now I love it. In the beginning, I hated tofu, tempeh, almond milk, etc. and now they are all favorites of mine. And I can't believe that I ever didn't love Indian food. I would happily eat it every single day especially this recipe.
It has been a very nice day today. It was 43º above at half past ten. The roads are very muddy now.
There are seventeen different fragrances that make up Editions de Parfums and these have been created by nine different noses or perfumers for Frederic Malle. These are some of my favourites as best described by the house of Frederic Malle.
An 84 year old security guard was shot to death last night outside the church he was watching in Detroit. Here’s the story from the Free Press.
That turned out to be a winning strategy for Alexander, but it wasn’t the kind of fight that most MMA fans willing think was worth their money on pay-per-view. It’s going to be tough for MMA Fight Pit to make it to a second pay-per-view event.
Well they’re not to happy about this down at the Jittery Goat Café. Pukey Borden said, “I still got the dings in my car from last year when the did the road I live on.”
Sex is a PERSONAL thing. It’s intimate, vulnerable and powerful. And how we treat our lover’s bodies AND our own – as lovers – has a larger impact on our sense of self and confidence in the world. Our genitals SHOULDN’T be an issue – but so often, they really are. It makes intimacy more difficult. It makes orgasms harder to achieve. It makes dating more challenging. It can attack your self-worth and identity in subtle and not so subtle ways – making any and all things in life more difficult than they need to be… from job interviews to bathing suit season, it infiltrates your LIFE. Once upon a time, genitals were revered, and perhaps we need to embrace that philosophy more in our modern society. But none of us can change the world, we can only change what WE do.
For now, I’m just content to explore Canada where I can still get lost in its vastness.
Despite these less-than-stellar moments, though, making these changes has only changed my standard of living in one way: I've been eating far healthier over the past few weeks. Eliminating plastic as much as possible also means eliminating most processed foods. The healthiest foods in the store- produce, grains, and beans, for example, don't come plastic wrapped.
I just sent the kids off to school. No pics. I am not that on top of things.
CV: Yes, Doug is a good friend of mine, but his pictures are elaborately staged theater, which he makes to look effortless. I much prefer Doug's personal family theater to Crewdson's theater of actors.
Mostly I just did what I could last week with what my shin dealt me. I tried to balance enjoying New Zealand and all of its opportunities with not damaging/worsening my shin. On all of my summit trips this week there was lots of hiking on the uphills and the downhills weren't too bad, usually because of ample scree for a fast and cushioned descent.
tillthey transmute into metal-
However, I'm writing this down (seriously kind of embarrassed, but making myself do it). Yesterday I started to try to do the Insanity workouts.
STORY: B
The Metropolitan Museum of Art advertisement for their exhibit, 'Francis Bacon: A Centenary Retrospective' refers to Bacon as, "one of the most compelling painters of the twentieth century". 130 of the deceast Irish born / English bred artist's works are currently on display. The collection spans his entire career. I enjoy seeing the different stages an artist goes through en route to discovering his own personal style so it should be interesting. But was this artist really, "one of the most compelling painters of the twentieth century" or simply just another eccentric gifted artist?
#52 Lou Mac
Making messes
Attached is the contract. Simply download, fill in the blanks, and send it back to me. Where it calls for your signature, you can type in your name and then add: (electronic signature valid and binding)
head of school food believes very strongly in whole foods and healthy
We have been cloth diapering Luke since he was born.
Location: Salt Lake City, UT
We do not have to tell our lungs, “Inhale,
That’s not all that has me freaked out. Something terrible happened last night, something that made Rhys break his own rule and save the life of a mortal. Trouble is he doesn’t remember anything from the past two hundred years. Like that he’s a vampire, not a Regency viscount with an English accent.
Your music is all over my car. I stored so much of your music in the “Jukebox” on my car when you would bring me a CD. I listen selectively. Music has always stirred me emotionally and your music serves up a double whammy. To tell you the truth some of it is so very weird I have wondered if you were picking on me to see if I would dare to question your musical tastes. You were such a snob concerning some things.
Dudley yesterday to meet the staff at The Village http://www.village-hotels.co.uk/hotels/dudley which is the venue for Samaritan's Purse Conference - first weekend in June. It has been a difficult week for me and I was feeling a bit low - it was not helped by the early start and traffic jams on the way. When I arrived, I was hot and thirsty and not feeling particularly positive about the meeting, sure that there were going to be barriers put up as I explained my plans for the Conference to them.
I hope that you have found this tutorial helpful and please do not hesitate to ask any questions. Just comment on this post and include your email address and I will get back to you asap!
Look beneath the recent war fears, and Little Satan is in a stronger position than ever. Its per capita gross domestic product rivals Italy’s (at $31,000). The World Economic Forum’s Global Competitiveness Index ranks Israel sixth in innovation capacity, just after Great Satan. It is behind only Great Satan and China in the number of companies listed on Nasdaq. Militarily, Little Satan is the region’s superpower, with an armed force that could easily defeat any of its neighbors (in any imaginable combination GsGf Editorial notation). Great Satan aid (Congress recently moved to add $1 billion for Little Satan’s missile defense program to the president’s budget) enhances its military edge. She also has one of the world’s largest new clear arsenals, estimated at more than 200 missiles. At home the wall along the West Bank has essentially solved the problem of Palestinian suicide bombing, rendering Little Satan safer than at any point in her history.
By Art. II Sec. 1 Cl. 8, the president must swear: "I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully execute the Office of President of the United States, and will to the best of my Ability, preserve, protect and defend the Constitution of the United States." He is bound by this oath in all matters until he leaves office. No additional oath is needed to bind him to tell the truth in anything he says, as telling the truth is pursuant to all matters except perhaps those relating to national security. Any public statement is perjury if it is a lie, and not necessary to deceive an enemy.
It seems like just yesterday it was July 15 and I was wondering how we were going to make it through another 7 weeks of summer. And here we are August 16 and school is creeping up and seeping in again. Band camp (yes, I'm serious), back to school nights, orientation days, supply lists, lunch box purchasing...guess that means the big yellow bus is right around the corner. (oh, how I love that bus!)
The bed was the same dark wood and only took 2 coats of paint....this is because I covered it completely with tinted primer first! I used a high density foam roller so there are no brush marks.
Imogen checked her backpack to ensure that everything she needed for school was there. She found her journal and verified that Liam had responded to her most recent entry which had been addressed to him. Both Imogen and Liam discussed gold in their writing.
Pour the milk mixture over the dry ingredients and toss and gently turn the ingredients with a fork until you’ve got a very soft dough. When the dough comes together, you’ll probably still have dry ingredients at the bottom of the bowl – just use a spatula or your hands to mix and knead the dough until it’s evenly blended. Don’t overdo it; it’s better to have a few dry spots than an overworked dough. Even with all the flour mixed in, the dough will be soft and sticky.
This guest post from Doris Dillon
Yea, and you're hamstrung by what you know can be real. This is a novel. You get to make stuff up. Go crazy. Invent stuff. LIE under oath!
It literally seems to be getting too fast for them to keep up with comfortably. No wonder the main man looks startled. The way it keeps velocitising, it must be all he can do to keep from bursting into flames.
Everything you see again from your childhood appears smaller and less significant when your an adult. The affect was felt here, too.
and wisdom to know the difference;
How did you get on with this? I realise this is quite a tough task on you, partly because it can mean admitting faults about yourself and we don't like doing that. If you need some support in this task, do feel free to get in touch and we can chat about it.
Start with Warm Brown: Bottom
We often phone the police -- but they never respond to these violent events.
Here’s a bit of balance that’s easy to incorporate into your daily life. It’s a great lesson to share with your kids, too. At every meal, your goal is to enjoy the food, eat nutrient dense choices (lots of vitamins and minerals) and to get the food groups you need for wellness. But, you also don’t want to make yourself crazy or measure portions or count calories. Here’s an easy strategy. Picture your dinner plate as a circle divided into quarters. In one-quarter, protein, in one-quarter, a complex carb (starch), in the other two quarters, vegetables. That’s the complete, balanced meal you should aim for each time. Now suppose you want a glass of wine or beer with dinner? That’s okay, it’s your carb quarter. You want cake for dessert? That’s your carb quarter. You just have to take a minute to choose what it is you want for that meal. Maybe you really, really, want both wine and cake (who doesn’t?). Once in a while, that’s okay too. You can still balance that choice by adding extra exercise time to your day. An additional 20 minutes of good cardio should do.
Do you ever find yourself saying, "if I can just get through this. . .", but then "this" comes and goes and you are right back where you were?
Look, I see a bee on friend bear’s nose
Arriving home the perfect remedy for the evening was waiting for her. Mommy was now home and her eldest brother, Patrick, was home from college for the weekend. We got her PJ's on, and set up on the couch sitting with her big brother, and with in a few minutes she was out for the night, and the next morning all was well.
Super Cinchy!!
Ink: Stampin' UP!
Then you have our kids.
14. My horse must lose (Portugal the man)
When I describe what it was like to grow up Jewish in Buena Park, California in the 1960′s and 1970′s I tell them that it is very similar to my own children’s experience in Kapolei, Hawaii. I was one of few Jewish kids in my school, along with Jon Sherman and Jason Oxman. There are only a few Jewish families on the west side of Oahu and significantly fewer in the state of Hawaii than in California then or now.
1 A-1. Petitions, Briefs, Records, and Other Materials prepared by George Anastaplo, as Counsel pro se (with respect to his application for admission to the Illinois bar): In re George Anastaplo, 3 Ill.2d 471, 121 N.E.2d 826 (1950-1954); 348 U.S. 946, 349 U.S. 903 (1955); 18 Ill.2d 182, 163 N.E.2d 429 (1959-1960); 366 U.S. 82, 368 U.S. 869 (1961). See, also, Proceedings, 405 U.S. xi, xxvi-xxviii (1972). See, for chronologies and other materials, Item B-1, below, pp. 331-418, Item B-2, below, pp. 105-14, and Items C-1986(3), C-1997(9), C-1998(11), and C-2001(4), below. See, also, Items D-X/13/1961, D-XII/22/1978, below. See, as well, Item B-15 (Projected), below, pp. 407-67 (2004).
Bible verse, Devo:: Starting into Ephesians tomorrow! Any good study helps?
So...what about you? Are you in a book club? What book has been your best discussion (or what do you think would make a great discussion book)? Ever been to a piano bar?
When I watch any old western I wonder if the train engineer, fireman and conductor had to be a union members or if the rail road had to get Army Corp Engineer permits to build the railroad over rivers and streams
Flowing to the ocean which each mighty river seeks!
In 2011, the total number of worldwide social networking accounts, including both consumer and corporate accounts, was nearly 2.4 billion (Facebook alone has an estimated 845 million monthly active users) and this figure (2.4B) is expected to grow to nearly 3.9 billion by year-end 2015. Let’s face it … Social Media is here to stay.
As I said, I am recently discovered, so I’m still learning and haven’t tried any traditional “gluten-free” cookbooks, but when I find some I like I’ll make an update post. Feel free to post some of your favorites below!
Grow the f*ck up, and stop bitching about how fat women are, and instead, try bitching about how nasty and sadistic they can be towards men and male sexuality.
Will the furniture go through the doors? Will it even negotiate the stairs? Will the house be warm? Will the house be quiet? Will it be noisy? Will the pets settle? Do I get some Feliway for the cats? Do they do a version for dogs? If not why not? What colour should the walls be? Will my man be happy there? Will I be happy there? and so it goes on, and on.
Over the last few days I have been swapping emails with one of my most ardent readers, Harbinger. Several commenters say that he is too negative, too forthright, too brutally honest. He is all of those things and I know that he won't be offended by that.
The YMCA was active in Vancouver early in the new city’s life. The newspaper records suggest their new premises on West Hastings Street were completed in 1893, to designs by Thomas Hooper. However photographs, like this Vancouver Archives image and the BC Archives picture below are dated 1890 – so perhaps it wasn’t completely finished for a while.
I started to write soon after I found my first pencil. But I began to write for publication about 30 years ago -- professional books. I wrote six of them, all still in print and still in use. Only lately have I turned to fiction.
I bring my hand to my head and massage my right temple. This field, these trees, they were the place of power that I saw in my dream. But it wasn’t the field nor the trees I saw in the dream, it was the power that I felt.
Peppers
A home with a tree is precious.
From this that He gave them, nothing more than bread and fish, and that He set this equally before all, He taught them moderation, frugality, and that charity by which they should have all things in common. This He also taught them in the place, in making them sit down upon the grass; for He sought not to feed the body only, but to instruct the mind.
3. Talks have begun between the French government and the new crowd in Washington over the Roquefort taxation issue. The new tariffs are not set to go into effect until March 23rd so I guess there's time to clear up the stink, so to speak.
Before stain:
High in the church tower the bell tolls out the hours: One... Two... Three... Nine O'Clock. An owl hoots in accompaniement: a warning to small creatures to lie low, stay close to their nests. As we may assume most human inhabitants of the village are staying close to theirs. The telly of course; the lives of most of them nowadays will revolve around the telly. The Nine O'Clock News. Some others will naturally be in the pub, The Cock Pheasant, but for those individuals, most of them, this will be their normal evening habitat. But one or two are not at home or in the Pheasant.
Since there is only month left for our magazine submissions, I’ve really started trying hard to get my manga going. I think everyone else is also starting to get into drawing mode. Have you started drawing yet? A reminder:
They're used to my brother being gone for Christmas
Kim Logan Hmmmmm...again this is a toughie..!!...Having spend all my professional life in art and photography I have dabbled in pretty much everything..!!...I have however just discovered PMC and would like to pursue a curiosity with this medium. I would love to combine jewellery with art somehow and be able to offer a personalised piece of jewellery art..!
I know you tell me that it's enough...
I am really excited about my upcoming vacation. Only 43 days to go. (For those of you who are looking for an empty house to rob, forget about it. I hired a live-in house sitter that will stay in my house all day and night for the whole time we are away.) Today I took a Virtual Vacation by Google mapping at street level. It was neat seeing the places I will be going.
Lasagna!
Oy Sinebrychoff Ab Sinebrychoff Porter
Coming on to today's post,
How awesome is the Penguin getting all paternalistic?
I see the city lights, the endless plights
As ever, there's a £10 voucher to spend at up for grabs for our winner!
* What advice do you have for anyone interested in working with Smart Quill Editorial?
I loved this tartare. I have only recently started liking sushi, and I still won't eat completely raw fish. I really liked this tartare though, because its almost like a ceviche. The lemon juice 'cooks' the salmon, and the resulting dish is just chock full of flavour, and is so soft and almost creamy. The cucumber salad just adds an extra dimension of flavour and texture to the dish, and the whole plate of food just sings with flavour.
More importantly, a good show of support may keep these games in Colwyn Bay beyond 2013, and may also prove to some of the southern-centric members of the WRU, that supporting and developing Rugby in the North will be beneficial for all of Welsh Rugby.
Here is the closet all empty and clean.
I’ll be demonstrating Endnote Web on the following dates and times:
I use it almost daily for the dishes now (hot water takes a while to get to the tap and so as to not waste too much, I boil it). For making coffee or tea or hot chocolate. It already gets a lot of use. But I've found one more way to make it useful for us.
"Because I like to learn new things. I already have six degrees, but learning new things, " He pointed to his head, "keep my brain working well." He rotated his hands to show the workings of a brain (or anything for that matter), required constant movement.
I have to share with you this insanely delicious, absurdly simple way to cook winter squash. Once again what I'm giving you is a recipe adapted from a Mark Bittman recipe (he calls it Roasted Winter Squash Slices), and I'm sure you get it by now - Bittman makes great, simple recipes we should all cook all the time... but I feel the need to share this in particular because the recipe says "oil or melted butter" and if you're anything like me, you usually opt for oil when given the choice between the two, especially for oven roasting. But I'm here to say, forget the oil for once, TRY THE BUTTER! It is COMPLETELY different from roasting in olive oil. The butter - it browns! and turns nutty and fragrant in the oven during the roasting time, and I've never tasted more complex, rich, delicious squash flavor. I'm also going to tell you about a version of a crustless spinach quiche my friend Emily recommended (which she adapted from a recipe on Smitten Kitchen), and which we ate together with the squash for a very delicious eat-the-rainbow type vegetarian meal.
Yes, indeed, we had a lovely Christmas. From Thanksgiving when my brother and family, and my mom and our family gathered to Christmas with my husband's sister and our family.......it was really lovely. Seeing so much family for the holidays hasn't happened like that in a number of years so it was a sweet gift. I hope your Christmas was also happy and that your new year is, too! Sometimes, I find it hard to believe when I realize it is 2012. Can it really be 12 years since the Millennium?!! Time flies so fast. And speaking of time, it is just two hours til the clock strikes midnight and the new year arrives here in Minnesota. I think it's time for a snack and a cup of cocoa. See ya tomorrow!
Engine started first time and simply drove it off the trailor. Thanks Craig. Runs well and is a 1600 twin port. Looks to be clean and in good condition.
11And I beheld another beast coming up out of the earth; and he had two horns like a lamb, and he spake as a dragon.
The plot also involves Chinese neo-colonialism in Africa, and at one point it seems to me that Mankell might be using his novel to make propaganda for Robert Mugabe’s regime in Zimbabwe. Of course it is always risky to assume that the views expressed by a character in a novel reflect the views of the author, but coming after the rather heavy didacticism of the preceding pages, I rather suspect that this does reflect Mankell’s view.
My dad had an analogy of his own. The hardware, as in the infrastructure, is excellent and pristine (at least in Shenzhen it is). The software (the people), however, are still in progress. The best case in point would be the roads and the drivers. The roads are beautifully paved, with logical and functioning signal lights; however, there is no sense of right of way, and the streets are a symphony of honking. For the most part, the lights are programmed so that, for the first half-minute or so, cars left-turning have right of way but non-turning traffic is still permitted to run. However, once that first half-minute expires, many of the left-turning drivers still power through the intersection, honking at anyone and anything in their way. Every driver thinks that he or she is the king of the road. It’s actually surprising that I didn’t see any car crashes there. I’d assume everyone’s trained to have better reflexes on the road there. That kind of attitude does translate into customer service, to an extent. Most of the store employees we interacted with were much colder than you’d find in Taiwan or even the US; that said, they worked with a rather intriguing amount of efficiency. Now, a part of the coldness comes from their general lack of facial expressions. Their neutral stare seems to be one of “piercing into your soul with eyes of contempt”, while their standard voice sounds like they’re trying to imply that “I’m really annoyed with you”. Maybe I’m just not used to them.
Those that know me, work with me, and such can't believe that I have the phone that I do or use the laptop that I do. I am a techie in my classroom. I LOVE and can't live without my interactive board or document camera. I'm always looking for the newest tech thing, website, and such for my classroom. BUT when it comes to personal technology I was always fine with what I have/had.
The Democrat & Chronicle reported that Rochester Business Alliance President Sandy Parker stated, “Rochester’s students are our region’s future work force, so we have a vested stake in their success.
1/4 teaspoon cloves
The Berger cookie is a simple little yellow cake cookie with a chocolate topping. And not chocolate icing, oh no. Chocolate fudge. Sugar infested, fat-filled, crowded with calories, savory fudge. A cross section view of the Berger will expose the fact that there is just as much fudge involved as there is cookie. They are basically fat bombs, but they are oh so worth it. Just for comparison sake, an Oreo cookie is 54 calories, an E.L. fudge cookie is 70 calories. and a Girl Scout Thin Mint is 38 calories. When I decide to indulge in a Berger cookie, I realize it is a serious calorie commitment. Two of those babies can completely wipe out a two mile run on the treadmill. Four of them.....I've got to run for 40 minutes just to burn them off.
In the first book, Tengo meets Fuka-Eri. As he edits her novella, he learns more about and is drawn into the strange world she represents. Meanwhile, Aomame accidentally travels from 1984 into an alternate reality (in which two moons hang in the sky) that she calls 1Q84. As she attempts to figure out what happened to her, the reader learns about her daily life and her relationship with the Dowager. This first book is overtly political in its attitude concerning such issues as protest movements, new religions, publicly sanctioned sexism, and the business of literary publishing.
"I was wondering if it was a scam. Put a patch over one eye, tell a story over your cell just loud enough to be heard and wait for money?"
He added in a lower voice, “I am someone that their kind can’t deal with. I fight to win . I’m their worst nightmare. And I’m not afraid to die. If it’s worth fighting for, it’s worth dying for!”
In summary – avoid fruit in favour of vegetables if weight loss and great health are your goals. And be selective int he vegetables you chose. Follow the paleo diet and in this way, your weight will continue to fall off. Finally avoid those public health campaign messages….or at least investigate for yourself and check that the findings are based on scientific evidence and not fuelled by an industry with a vested financial interest! So the very next time you hear a food manufacturer or distributor telling you it’s part of your five-a-day, you’ll be saying No Way!
Dark lager with balls, like Ayinger Altbairisch Dunkel. Amber and malty Oktoberfests fit here, too, but probably should be seasonal.
One thing that works best for me is to remember that these people are just people. Try to think about how they see you or think about how you see them. If you admire how carefree they are then maybe they would feel the same if you were too- if you let yourself relax and be yourself.
One half teaspoon corriander
One of the “DENIAL” indicators mentioned in Gregory Stanton’s papers states: “They block investigations of the crimes.” This single indicator specifies exactly how the ANC regime has crossed the line into the denial stage, by allowing its police farce to plummet into a state of utter disgrace, so much so that they have to use the power of the media to boast about the their few odd accomplishments! Whenever the police make an arrest or shoot a couple of robbers, you can be sure it will be screened on national television at peak viewing hours. Who are they trying to bluf, because the scum who commit these crimes do not watch the news on TV? So screening these incidents have no deterrent effect whatsoever!
I haven’t written a review for a while, but tonight I watched The Thing and wanted to get this out. It's 3:17 in the morning so please pardon any overt typos... :D
And the sparkles of lightning go flashing by,
of course, there are certain things i'll continue to hold on to... things that i will always treasure and will enjoy pulling out of a box to show isaac some day... things that will give him a glimpse into my past and what it was that shaped me.
My editor is really great. When I went into this, I'll admit I was nervous. I'd heard all sorts of horror stories about editors wanting to slash and change everything and basically mutilating the original work. I've had none of that experience. While Rose does suggest changes, they're only to support the overall vision of the book and make it stronger. There has been no slashing or mutilation, which I think is good.
to drive minions
Morin threw five innings allowing just one run on four hits. He walked only one batter and struck out seven, increasing his season total to 22. Brady Fuller came on in relief in the sixth inning. The Grizzlies touched up Fuller for one run in the sixth and two more in the seventh. Fuller finished his night giving up five hits, three runs and striking out two.
I made the little cocktail table from a junk shop furniture leg and my great-uncle's silver plate. It is also naturally aged and wonderfully crusty.
All that in and out of air conditioning,
But, while Sinjin is a constant question mark, I also wanted to give glimpses into his personality that might make him appear softer, compassionate and caring. When writing Toil and Trouble, the most important character to me was Sinjin. Even though Rand plays a huge role, of course, this is really Sinjin's book--it's his chance to tell his story, to allow the reader a bit more into his thoughts.
When it comes to descriptions of sex, I learned, neither of the participants should come across like a doctor—even if one of them actually is a doctor. Remember that clinical is the opposite of dirty. And dirty, in this context, is good.
If you visit at Christmas, as we did, your focus will be on the city’s fantastic Christmas markets. It provides a sensory overload of sight, smell, hearing, taste and touch combined. Stalls bristle with bratwurst on crispy white rolls with mustard, drunk with mulled wine to combat the chill, and decorated gingerbread for a sweet-treat or roasted chestnuts grilled over braziers.
When Thor (Two-Disc Blu-ray/DVD Combo + Digital Copy)Thor came out I predicted that Loki would be the main villain in The Avengers (that much was obvious from the teaser after the end credits) and that the plot would center on preventing Ragnarök, a major plot point in the Thor comics. And while it wasn’t exactly an apocalypse (unless you were on the island of Manhattan), the end of the world as we know it was a real possibility so I’m going to consider myself 12% right, with an argument being made for 15%.
Time stood still, as everyone waited for my answer. All eyes were on me. Except for Annie's which were closed.
All in all, I really enjoyed this one!
My local DVD rental shop has just pulled down its rattling metal shutters for the last time, which has focused attention inside the Glamour Cave on the subject of paying for culture (or "content" as it's often described these days. I always think that makes it sound as if it comes in a tin). As a side-effect it's also made me feel a bit older, as if I've lost a slightly smelly, close friend to a war of attrition (against new technology): the carpets in there had needed a clean for about five years but I was still exceptionally fond of the place. I liked the owner and I'd had hundreds, if not thousands, of hours of pleasure as a result of borrowing videos and DVDs from him.
Direct-Disc Labeling No
“The entire village came under heavy missile attack by the army, killing the entire population… I am a man of very strong nerves, but that day, I just broke down completely… The following day, people from adjacent villages came and buried all the dead in a mass grave.”
But . . . . as a sometimes public speaker, wannabe writer, and frequent pontificator, I have come to believe over the years that our choice of words has deep meaning. As such, we need to be careful about the words we use, how we define them, and the meanings that they convey. I DO believe that kids need structure. But when people say this, I think they really mean something very different.
The weather is always a topic in Michigan. Last Saturday my daughter and I attended an all-day, out-door orientation for new volunteers at the horse ranch. The morning was spent bundled with mittens and warm coffee under cover listening to lectures. During a delicious lunch hot off the grill the sky cleared, temps soared to 70* and we were in short sleeves for hands on horse-handling for the rest of the afternoon.
Sunday: Winging it!
Making a return to the countdown is the black and white cutout, this time of Lalo Schifrin smoking a pipe - that was the best promo shot that could be offered? - against a lurid purple backdrop. That sort of low-tech associating got us through that troubled decade together.
Also, good news on the house front: We learned last week that the bank has accepted our offer on the home we plan to buy in Hudsonville. Possession will be sometime near Thanksgiving, so we now have a home to look forward to moving into sometime shortly after that. Such a relief!
lover of the outdoors, and would always prefer to be outside
“I know,” replied Tybalt. “Night is very dark indeed because there is no light, because light is made by the Sun which is notably absent after sunset.”
As you face one of life’s greatest trials, know that God is there for you. Despite numerous challenges, there is good news: You can still experience the joy of the Lord.
YA readers! I'm also happy to send up to five individual signed bookmarks!
With the start of Volume 7, #1 (Aug/47), MISS AMERICA undergoes a big change as Stan Lee takes over as editor and art director. The magazine, while still sporting photo covers, will gravitate back towards being a comic book. Nearly all of the fashion pages and commercial advertisements are dropped. A second and then a third Patsy Walker story is added and now the text and feature illustrations are being done by Timely staff artists like Syd Shores, Mike Sekowsky, Christopher Rule, Mario Acquaviva, Frank Carin and Lin Streeter. Ruth Atkinson even freelances illustrations to accompany text stories she writes. Most surprising of all, is the possible discovery of pulp and golden-age Timely artist out of the Chesler shop, Newt Alfred, drawing text illustrations in Vol 7, #13 (Aug/48)! Alfred is known as the pulp artist on The Whisperer and his previous Timely appearances are relegated to features in MYSTIC COMICS on features like The 3 X's, The Blue Blaze, Zara of the Jungle and The Invisible Man Known As Dr. Gade in 1940.
I’ve written before about what I perceive as the inefficient nature of this country, but my ethnocentric blinders may be on (please see Disclaimer No. 1) in regards to this. I may be wrong about why people wait in line to pay, so If I am, please let me know.
An eternal principle
The Ontario government is in debt and wants to use gaming as way to generate millions of dollars in additional revenue to help balance the budget. Ontario Place has been shut down and the question is does it make sense to locate a casino in the big city of Toronto and in particular, Ontario Place? There are those bloggers that believe Ontario Place was shut down to create a place for the casino to be located. The issue raised by bloggers is centered in the City of Toronto but has repercussions for other centers all across Ontario that currently are licensed to operate casinos such as Orillia and Niagara Falls. Blog entries are motivated by those opposed to the plan and by those who are skeptical of the Ontario government plans. The gaming industry, reputable individuals, those impacted by these plans, those citizens who are opposed to the expansion of gambling, and angry citizens of Ontario who are fed up with the liberal government are all blogging about the decision to expand casinos to larger Ontario centers. The news media, major communication companies, and concerned citizens spreading their views by word of mouth, are all responsible for expressing their viewpoints on this hot topic.
I replied in silence.
I honestly just cannot tell you how wonderful this book is, and I highly recommend it to anyone and everyone.
Nil Giri is the highest hill resort of Bangladesh with amazing natural beauty. This Resort is located 47 km South-East of Bandarban town on Chimbuk Range at a height of 2400 feet from sea level. It has a high class residential accommodation that makes a difference. This beautiful resort in the top of the mountain maintain by the Bangladesh Army. You will be amazed when you see that the cloudy sky often kisses the peak of the hill. Gentle breeze was blowing down the hill side and thin clouds were hanging around on their way to casual fly. Dimmed through the clouds, silver moon light was rolling down the folds and slopes. It is Imagine the scene! Clouds are playing with you and you can touch them! This is the most attractive place of Bangladesh for those who love hills and clouds.
Priscilla….(giggle)…that is the….(more giggling and some crying)…..funniest thing I’ve ever….(more giggling)….re….(giggling and crying)….ad.
5 R.A.Butler,”The Art of the Possible, (London. Hamish Hamilton),1971, p173.
Do you think I could add any more adjectives to the title? Ummm, how about.... delicious?
The matter was postponed to May 16. - Sapa
Yesterday afternoon saw all the months of sketching, planning, designing and sweating finally come together when we started to build our booth for the ECR House & Garden Show 2011 starting this Friday. Taking something from your head and trying to lay it out into an empty six square metres is nooooo easy feat. But very glad to say that the results have left with me with the happiest little mud hut heart indeed and all the sleepless nights were well worth it.
As predicted, Iron Man/Tony Stark gets a most of the snark, but Dr. Banner is up there, too, and the Hulk gets most of the physical humor—Mark Ruffalo is perfect for this role. Black Widow becomes a real person in this, more than worthy of a movie of her own and if that movie doesn’t feature Hawkeye, too, I’m lodging a protest—his arms alone are box office gold, and since those arms are attached to the incredibly talented Jeremy Renner, it ought to be a done deal by now.
6. Reading. I love books, how they smell, how they feel, how they look lined up in perfect order on my bookshelves. I am especially drawn lately to beautifully detailed and photographed cookbooks.
With several issues around the way the exhaust affects the cars handling, Red Bull said in China that the V2 sidepod was the potentially better solution, but the V1 set up gave Vettel more confidence. Horner admitted that it was possible to get the performance of the V2 with the feel of the V1. At Bahrain it appears that this is what RBR have done.
MEANWHILE ANOTHER REALY DUMB AND STUPID LIBERAL CLEARLY SEEKING REVENGE FOR HIS PAST POLITICAL FIASCOS Michael Ignatieff warns that Quebec separation likely‎ BUT NEXT THE Former Liberal leader Michael Ignatieff backpedalled from THE VERY controversial comments he made during an interview with the BBC that Quebec will “eventually” become an independent country IS RATHER SAYING NOW “Since I passionately want Quebec to remain part of the Canadian fabric, and since these friends have defended this idea with courage and pride, it causes me pain to think that anything I said could be used against a cause – the national unity of my country – that they and I hold dear,” HIS SEPERATION VIEWS WERE CONTRADICTED BY poll on Quebecers’ attitudes, in the Montreal La Presse newspaper.It pegs support for independence at 36 per cent — well below the historic highs of the early 1990s and even lower than the level in the first sovereignty referendum, more than three decades ago. Dumb and Stupid Liberal again. No wonder they are on the way out.
Geoffrey Chaucer put the matter pithily and beyond answer in The General Prologue:
On one hand, the answer is a resounding “Heck No.” What’s in front of me is a first draft. It needs to be read and re read and edited and all those Face-palming grammatical, typographical and continuity slip-ups need to be corrected. All that, however is fodder for another post.
PLUME GATE FOIA FUKISHIMA VOLCANIC RADIOACTIVE WASTE CLOUD coming to USA -GATE APRIL 21. 2012 DOSING CHILDREN W/ TREATMENTS OF IODINE INFANTS TOO FOR THYROID RANGE
Hayati:- Hello! I am Norhayati, from Singapore. I’m married with 2 beautiful daughters; a 3 year old and 1.5 year old who had been the main subjects of my pages.
Well all that just cannot be done on the radio. The bilingual puns ("Aon bo" is the Irish for "One cow") and all the rest only exist as words on paper. They've got to go.
They smell gorgeous, too. ^_^ It's been too long since I've had flowers in the house.
It's not about what beer is, but what beer does. That's a quote from Erik "Big" Boles, my business partner and the Founder/CEO of Beer Tap TV. It's one of the many quotables he and I have come up with to nutshell our philosophy on the juggernaut that is craft beer.
2) When should I go?
That's priceless!
We've tried lavender oil and smearing ourselves with lard, but it seems creams and sprays make no difference.
The drummers
Christan: You said women who miscarry respond differently to this experience. Why do you think it was so deeply painful for you?
숨 (Breath)
To ramp up Dante's fitness, we have gradually increased our sets from 3 x 5 to 3 x 7 sets. Only in the month of May did I start galloping every five days, and we will do one more 3 x 7 sets and two 3 x 8 sets before Colorado. The trot sets have ramped up from 2 x 15 to 2 x 25 and will up to 2 x 30.
Well made, entirely satisfying, and after two lighter beers from The Kernel I'm really looking forward to the Export Stout I have waiting.
With St. Patrick's Day creeping up on the calendar, I could not wait to share a few rare ska and reggae songs that The Pogues are famous for playing as part of their varied live and recorded sets over the years.
Did he rhyme?
Zuma has strong support from the country's powerful trade unions and its small but influential communist party. Mbeki's wing of the party is more friendly to investors, having adopted policies that spurred nearly a decade of economic growth.
The family is devastated and worried to death about the children! I wish that I could be there with my friend to help her through this hard time but I can try my best to help from afar!
Bright sun
My fifth favorite single of the month of April come from the star of this month’s Spotlight post, Adam Lambert! “Never Close Our Eyes” is the second official single from his upcoming sophomore album, “Trespassing.” The song was co-written by Bruno Mars and is a really gorgeous addition to Adam’s repertoire. It is, essentially, a song about not wanting to let the night, or the moment, you are in end because you want to experience the joy you are feeling forever. It’s not some brand new concept or something that has never been done before but it definitely has Adam’s signature vocal stamp on it and a really catchy melody and fun dance sound. I am absolutely loving this song and it has only gotten me that much more excited for the release of his new album, on May 15, 2012! I highly recommend downloading this track – it will be stuck in your head for ages and keep you dancing in your seat, your car or anywhere else you may be listening to it.
On Elaphonisi I forgot that I was a ginger and the sun is not my friend and burnt my ass pretty badly. Yes my whole back and the backs of my legs, but especially my ass. That is the worst. Serves me right, sitting on the evil little wood and straw chairs that every cafe seems to keep.
... and a bow. Opposition likes to undo anything I do. Opposition likes to take out anything that has been put away. Opposition likes to scribble on my invoices. Opposition likes to dump out bags of buttons. Opposition likes to scout out candy in my desk. Opposition likes to squish her finger through my chap stick. Opposition likes to type on my computer. Opposition likes to sit in my lap while I sew. Opposition leaves her care bears on my floor. Opposition likes to play on my ipad when I'm not looking. But doesn't Opposition look adorable in a dress?
A colourful prompt for today…
Originally a journalist, I’ve been an accidental web designer for over two years and have spent most of my professional life working in that strange space where content meets technology. Since 2004, I have managed to work on either sides of the Deloitte Drive at Madhapur, Hyderabad. I’m passionate about the things that interest me - my family, people in general and popular culture.
I can hear the beat of my swift blood's feet,
I am tired, too, after a couple of weeks of late finishes and early starts.
Have you seen our Great Barrier Reef? Maybe you should make it a priority! ...and don't forget to sign the petition too.
The Orphan Rescue by Anne Dublin with illustrations by Qin Leng
“You’re an asshole.” She pivoted and got into her car.
“Some of those concentrations were up to 100-1,000 times higher than what had existed off Japan before the accident,” said Buesseler. “Those levels are still low relative to direct impacts on humans, in terms of exposure, and organisms living in them. And, even if you eat the seafood from these waters off shore, that would be the primary pathway by which you might be affected at this point in time.”
Okay. So it’s not alright for a brewer in the southeast valley to put out a beer called Sun Devil Ale,” but it’s okay for a brewer in Tempe to put out a beer called “Devil’s Pitchfork Pale Ale.”
After a rainy summer we are having a lovely “Indian summer”, although the nights are beginning to get colder. I saw a black snake this week on my afternoon walk however and I am very much looking forward to them hibernating. I envy all of you in the Northern hemisphere now going into spring, especially after what seems to have been a very cold winter.
It should be remembered that the laws of our country were traditionally based on the Holy Bible where it says "an eye for an eye". Unfortunately our laws and our ability to make our own laws have been completely undermined by the "New Fascism" of the E.U.
From what I remember, Grandpa volunteered such stories, as he did many others. He talked about not knowing or really remembering his mother. And about his father feeling a “strangeness” in his hands as he was washing up at the dental practice they had come to share, before the collapse that ended in his death. The evidence of these ancestors was all around — in the letters of R.E. Ley Sr.’s name that remained near the entrance to the dental office even in my childhood; in the picture of my great-grandmother and my grandfather as an infant that hung in his den; in the twin memorial LEY benches that marked her grave in East Avenue cemetery in New Phila and also the grave of her husband and his second wife far across the grounds from where she lay in her parents’ plot; and in the stories, of course.
aside like Moses to the miracle
A child is beaten to death in Laventille by a male relative.
The Gnostic rush many of us felt upon first seeing the Wachowski Brothers’ “The Matrix” was the heady sensation that somehow a deprogramming meme had made it through the corporate maze of AOL-Time-Warner, and that the dream factory itself had been tricked into promulgating a flash of gnosis. Millions responded and suddenly there was much more money on the table. All too predictably, the second and third Matrix films smothered the first film’s spark of insight under tons of ever more dazzling special effects, violence, and pretentious symbolism. The still small voice of the wake-up call embedded in film one was drowned out by the din of its own success. The series’ degeneration was an uncanny recapitulation of the suppression of ancient Gnosticism by the early Church. In the end, the Matrix – like the Church before it – emerged triumphant.
I can see the pharisees questioning Jesus over the Sabbath day without them knowing He’s the Lord of the Sabbath. I discovered the Sabbath day was only an envelop carrying the message of REST. And because they were not interested in the message of REST in the envelop, instead interested in the envelop itself, then use it to pin down others.
But after showing him a YouTube sneak peak video on Transformers: The Ride 3D, Universal Studios has surpassed Walt Disney World in his mind. He sees Universal Studio’s rides as way cooler.
In the road stood a really ugly little Welsh Dresser, so forlorn and dark brown, like a small, lost, wet dog, that
I'm giving away an ARC of Balthazar to one lucky person!
The “When You Die You Come Back As Me” Hell.
I realized yesterday that years have gone by since we broke up. It seems so far away, yet not that long ago. I am glad that you are happy now and not under pressure to deal with me. I reread an email you sent me when we were breaking up and it amazes me that while you hated me so much you also loved me beyond logical measure. Things are calmer now that you aren’t in my life, but there is something to be said for the untethered emotion you live your life with.
"Glitter and Trauma" has until the 14th July on KDP Select. That means that all Amazon Prime customers can read it for free. On top of that, it's only $2.99 in the USA, £1.95 in the UK and EUR 2,68 in Spain, Germany, France and Italy. In order to promote the book a little more, I'm beginning
17For it is the Lord our God who has taken us and our fathers out of the land of Egypt, out of the prison-house, and who did all those great signs before our eyes, and kept us safe on all our journeys, and among all the peoples through whom we went:
Today I mixed 1/4 recipe of the sugar-water-acid solution. It's very thick, actually when first mixed it reminded me of the surprising consistency of my amniotic fluid when my water broke, but I digress. So I took the solution to where I had put the deadly strawberry jam mixture and put it around it. I thought that I'd just leave the jam there, after all who knows what other insects it might prevent from coming in the house--two days ago we had a huge carpenter ant enter the house via the same window that the sugar ants come in. But I guess I'd have to mix it with wood for it to appeal to a carpenter ant? I don't really know...but if I Google it...! :D
Hour 2 (3pm)
Also for Class 2: Narrative Game Theory? What is a 'character' made of?
This crazy feeling
People in London are being taken away in unmarked police vans, never to be seen again...
And he fell to the earth, and heard a voice saying unto him, Saul, Saul, why persecutest thou me? And he said, Who art thou, Lord? And the Lord said, I am Jesus whom thou persecutest: it is hard for thee to kick against the pricks.
black paper or ribbon
I repainted the hallway a bright white (paint which was sitting in the garage) and we moved up a bench from the basement which we only use as extra seating when we have a larger-than-6 dinner party. I tapped into my collection of pillow covers (I hoard linens thanks to Mom) and VOILA, a whole new entryway for ZERO dollars!! WOOT WOOT!
“Sahar Gul has recovered from her wounds, and she is mentally better,” said Nazia Faizi, head of Monitoring and Assessment in the Ministry of Women’s Affairs. “We brought Sahar Gul from the hospital on March 18, 2012, to Women for Afghan Women, which is a women’s shelter in Darulaman, a district in the west of Kabul, where she has a shared room with a single bed.” Her roommate is named Mumtaz, a young girl from Kunduz who was attacked by acid and her face was disfigured by unknown men a few months ago.
Vonnegut several times over his career cited Mark Twain as a sort of literary patron saint for him (he went so far as to name his only son after Twain) and in Cat's Cradle there certainly is a kinship with Twain's latter writings, namely in the way that humor is used to underscore the terrible realities present in everyday life. In this novel, Vonnegut develops his story brilliantly, rarely wasting space, even when it might seem at first that certain narrative events might be too bizarre for comprehension. Everything is focused toward setting up the conclusion and that conclusion is executed almost perfectly. This is perhaps one of Vonnegut's two or three best novels for prose, theme, and narrative execution and it certainly is worthy of being considered a "Masterwork" for how well it utilizes SF tropes on nuclear end-of-earth settings to convey a strong and clear message about ourselves and our ways of life. It is, when looked at in an anthropological fashion, a sort of ethnologue of our lives, our dreams, and how easily we can self-deceive ourselves. It is an enduring work, one that has lasted far past the MAD years and one that still contains some terrible truths that we still need to confront nearly a half-century after its initial publication. So it goes.
Other products to consider would be universal life, non-participating whole life and participating whole life. Each of these products offers different characteristics to fill a client’s financial need. These permanent products offer cash-value accumulation and protection guarantees. Although these products may require initial higher premiums, they provide for more long-term flexibility than a no-lapse UL product. These products offer flexibility in different ways. For this discussion, assume there is enough money (typically at least three premiums are paid), and available cash surrender value, to meet premium payments when needed.
This weekend, I hope you take some time out to read the latest issue of Nesting Newbies. You will be inspired by the many amazing and talented people that are featured this month. I am just honored to be among them. Thank you Jodi and Lea for inviting me!
4. Why is that? Well, part of the reason might be that this is book four in the Bridgerton family series and there might be an assumption that the reader might already know the family and the basic romance constructs Ms. Quinn utilizes. I point this out so you can keep it in mind when writing romance copy for your first novel. You need to do more rather than less to make your romance pitch stand out.
The most common method is actually painting the new hat and uniform on the player. While the famous Yankee cap and pinstripes have been applied well on the above Mickey Rivers card, there are some instances that might end up in a horror movie one of these days.
ACTING DUO
But you treat me like a stranger and I feel so rough
Did you know the AFA offers various certification programs to its members, such as Fence Installation School, Certified Installer Programs and Automated Gate Operator Installer Programs? Not only does AFA offer week-long classroom and field-based modules, the Association is committed to training teachers on a regional level so other chapters can provide the same modules to members on a local level. These programs are the highest professional certifications you can receive in the industry, and are a great way to elevate your company and team to a level well above the competition. You can view the different certifications and classes involved on the education portion of the AFA website. Classes and scholarship opportunities are also available to nonmembers.
The wall just to the right of the door is to be setup as the entryway.
With more than just a sense of deja vu I started up Disk Utility and erased the Mini’s hard disk again. I then installed Snow Leopard again, and set up new user account. Then I used a spare external drive to start taking Time Machine back ups at each step in the rebuild, after verifying the volume after each step. Then I began upgrading to Lion and bringing the system up to the latest software version using Software Update and the App Store.
This pretty perennial primula has proven to be vigorous and blooms very prolifically. This year it has been so covered in delicate pink blooms that you can barely appreciate the deep bronze – green foliage that adds interst in the garden long past blooming season.
I heard somewhere that making a wish when the clock is on 11:11 would bring good luck. So for the past five years I have made the same wish when I noticed the clock at that time... "Dear Lord, Please bless us with a healthy, happy child." I have said this prayer so many times that is almost second nature. So now that He has blessed us with our very own child I say a new prayer. "Dear Lord, Thank you so much for our blessing." It's my daily reminder that God does answer prayers. Maybe not in the exact way you had imagined but in the exact way you need.
“I am here to say my sister still has rights, and there is no way you can have this district attorney represent my sister,” said Candace Zamperini, (Kathleen Peterson’s sister). “They are not prepared, they haven’t read the documents…..I will tell you, this district attorney’s office is not the district attorney’s office of Jim Hardin, where I got good representation.”
Yet in the case of Young against both QPR and Villa, it is inconceivable that neither of the Assistants or the Fourth Official, saw the exaggeration in the player’s fall but none had the courage to intervene. If they did then the referees in choosing to ignore such opinion reveal their dictatorial mindset on the pitch; if they do not trust their closest advisors then they would be better running for high office in football than a match.
My hope was to try to embody some of the excitement and joy present with the birth of a child.
Useless of course. Once awake, wide awake so read for a few minutes, good book, gripping story, glanced at clock. 6.30am.
If we manage to win the National title town will be even crazier than last night!
by Peter Straub
Do you ever stop and ask, 'Is it all going to happen again?'
12. Silvertone
Sims was being held in lieu of $2,600 bail on charges that include possession of the marijuana and firing a weapon in public.
not sure if i mentioned being all gimped up (i could easily check if i did, but i will not out of sheer laziness), but i was. turns out climbing a foot high mountain of snow and falling forward while your foot sinks into said mountain is not the best for your ankle or your deltoid tendon, whatever that is.
Folded: 27cm x 88cm x 62cm
you heavenly beauty of a human soul,
Robert Downey Jr. does what he does best, my concern originally was that maybe he was going to take the spot light as such, I would say that Iron Man does get more screen time and Stark gets some of the best moments in the film but this is a team movie and though he gets a little more time it doesn’t ruin the film or take away from the other characters, Tony Stark evolves the most in this film, he grows as a character. He also has some of the funniest interactions in the movie, with some genuine laugh out loud moments. Downey Jr. in my eyes is the prefect Tony Stark, the man is a fantastic actor and he really brings Stark to life.
When a publisher operates on net proceeds received, then you, the author, would only get a royalty on what the publisher received after the discount.
Despite the defensiveness of British evolutionists, I think my criticisms carried some weight, because Cambridge biologist Michael Majerus decided to repeat Kettlewell’s experiments, but doing them correctly this time.
1 piece of 12 x 12 solid card stock in a coordinating color
I made this bread twice. I used raisins and halved the recipe both times. The first time I followed the recipe as written, but the second time I made quite a few modifications. Personally, I thought the second one was amazing and the first one was just okay. The first bread, while good, was very plain. I felt that the only flavor to be found was in the raisins and in the butter I slathered on top of the bread. The buttermilk gave it a great tang, but I found the consistenccy to be almost a little tough because of the lack of fat. So, what did I do? Simple. I added flavor, fat, and calories--something I rarely do.
2. The exoticization of our land as a harsh climate, to be conquered and survived ‘together.’ First, as mentioned above, the advertisement addresses the viewer as being a part of the privileged, white culture whose roots reach from the ‘founding’ explorer’s heritage to the present-day (white) Canadian. Second, this land was being survived and supported by First Nations people long before white settlers came. Though the theme of human vs. nature is not necessarily wrong, I believe it is outdated and it is this perspective we need to CHANGE in order to begin to heal the planet of all the damage we have caused it. Third, the advertisement supports eugenics with the belief that “we” (white people) were born to dominate the land as a result of not only genetics, but also by birthright.
Prouducts: The corners, I used Design Adhesives by Clearsnap which are design double sided adhesives which you use with glitter, embossing power, flocking, etc. and are very user friendly and mine were sprinkle with glitter.! Guitars from stash, Flowers: SCACD, Nestability: Classic Hearts embossed with Cuttlebug embossing folder. Heart Paper: Sweet Owl by Trim Craft, Leaves were punch with Martha Stewart Leaf Punch. I distressed the hearts with Tim Holtz distress ink: Antique Ribbon.
I'm still recovering. I think that I need at least two more years before I plan another slumber party. It makes me wonder: How did my mom do it? She survived 3 daughters and we all had slumber parties.
She started talking about all the people who she lost in her life with tears streaming down her face. Somehow it became this comparison on how many people have died in each of our lives. Everyone was listing off the few people in their lives while Nicole listed off at least 5 people, including her sister who died about 8 years ago, then I said something like "if we're going to make this a competition then I win because my babies died." There was that second of silence where everyone gets a little uncomfortable and I was really afraid that I had ruined the evening with my inappropriate joke, but then Nicole started talking about her loss too.
I wish I had a video of Kyle's face when he at the first one--That does a mom's heart good :)
Using a cookie scoop or your hands, place tablespoon-sized balls of dough onto prepared pans. Using a fork, lightly make a crisscross pattern on the top of each cookie. Be careful not to over-flatten the cookies. Sprinkle each cookie lightly with sugar. (I like to use sanding sugar to give them a little extra sparkle.)
- He's a nice man, says Tom.
This is not the sort of book to tackle if you're looking for something light - even in the book's happier moments, there's an undercurrent of melancholy. But overall it was a very uplifting, very engaging read. I highly recommend it.
on a spectacular late summer day.
* Scroll to the October 14 Scars on Broadway event and click on that link to request tickets
Nicholas Royle – Lancashire
To me these flowers work for romantic weddings, vintage weddings, winter weddings, dark weddings, I could go on! I haven’t been able to stop thinking about these flowers so naturally I had to create an inspiration board. When I see these beauties, I picture a wedding that incorporates a vintage style in a modern atmosphere such as a dark wood-lined restaurant. I have paired these with cream and white roses for a nice contrast, and included a lot of candles at varying heights.
Palin’s been cast as grifter/shill for Rothschild (BP)/Rockefeller (Exxon-Mobil)/ Rupert Murdock ‘s Media Empire (NewsCorp/HarperCollins/FoxNews) She also absorbs angst of right-aligned deluded masses; like Sarah, they’re “blind in the box”…
After all the ball throwing and wading in the waves we thought it would be fun to head into town. McDonald's had stopped serving breakfast which is a signal for JR and I that it is time for an adult beverage. We walked among the cruise ship tourists for awhile stopping periodically for people to ask: what kind of dog is that? Will she bite? (which makes us scoff) but the best thing we heard was a little boy who said:
Soyeon: how is it she always, always manages to seem so beamingly sensible? I often compare her in my mind to The Powerpuff Girls’ Blossom, and frankly it’s apt. I don’t mean to imply that Soyeon is bossy: though I think she does have a deliberately pert, cutely self-aware way of issuing instructions or commentary. I recall or else imagine that Paul Johnson once said, “Order itself is charismatic.” That feels true of Soyeon. No matter the chaos around her, she seems so perfectly in control. It’s as if she were born with an invisible teacup raised to her lips.
And I think they did
It’s take effort, sure, because you’re putting together two styles of writing. But if done right – and you have FUN – the outcome is great.
Thank you for stopping by...and don't forget to check out Dan's Great Give Away :o)
My hope is built on nothing less
RIN is six 50-minute episodes and I figured I’d keep watching as long as it kept me hooked.
This picture I just love, we were on our way back from seeing Ruby at Meme’s and you were playing with your hungry caterpillar toy one second, then I turned around the next and this was you….
writings found in I Corinthians 13. Read it several times and then
But will theatrical greats such as Sir Ian McKellen be comfortable breaking bread with a man who has described same-sex marriage as 'a disgrace to the nation and to God', and who boasted that when he was a young man, any sensible homosexual would have got out of his way because: 'I would have knocked him out.'
where the rains turn everything black.
The idea that this obsession that Natalie Portman’s character has with perfection can inevitably be both creative yet destructive. To me, it sums up so many of the big debates in modern times – from the increasing number of youth desiring different bodies,shapes and sizes, through to an overall increase in the perception that sometimes, what is in the media = beautiful. Although, I don’t agree with that notion, I do think that the film does make you think about how far people are willing to go for perfection – not just in the movie, but it really did have me thinking about perfection as a whole. Isn’t perfection, a state of mind then?
Another factor of note is the absence of any figures relating to Arabs, Turks, Albanians and East Europeans amongst the offenders. In view of the degree to which such groups feature amongst sex criminals, this inevitably leads one to speculate whether the researchers have followed the example of the FBI and included them under the single category “white”, so as to inflate the number they can pass off as native Britons.
One of my close friends is going through a divorce, great woman who works to prove that she doesn’t need a man to validate her existence. After many years of marriage she found out her ex husband was having an affair with another woman, this led her to find out things that really scarred her inside. This guy had it all, he made less money than she did, had her credit cards and was spoiled like few man are nowadays. It’s usually the other way around but this friend wanted her husband to have it all. Until she found out that he was buying condoms with her money. It’s sad but it’s only one of millions of similar stories I’m sure. There’s nothing like an awful split between two person’s, it stings, it hurts to see someone you loved hurt you that bad and try to explain why they have done what they’ve done.
Of course, the lack of jobs does not mean there’s any reduction in the number of job seekers.
The Cathedral in Lichfield has always been a focal point – especially with this being such a small city – and it played a key role in local Civil War battles. One Royalist sniper shot a Roundhead from the top of one of the cathedral spires; the spire was then destroyed in one of the three sieges of the town later in the war. So the central spire is relatively new. But this place has some great stories to tell from its own history and that of the Saxon Church on the same spot over the last 1400 years.
Like TNT, they are alarming, even to the point they can jolt the reader out of the story. Some editors and authors say use them only once per chapter or a handful of times for the whole book. And some say, “Never!” (Don’t worry, I’m not one of those.)
We've only seen flashbacks on the two individuals and have some information on the impact each of their pasts have had on them. Both are strong individuals with scars and baggage they are largely working through together. Why in the world would it matter which had it technical harder than the other.
Maybe he is interested only looking at him, see him from afar.
How soon they fly
With a mix of light-hearted technical information, whimsical historical illuminations and myth-busting facts the theatre/cabaret style production will delight and amaze – as well as showcasing a number of rather nice frocks if you’re into that sort of thing.
The men seem offended by this question. “If lesbians hate penises so much how come they use strap-ons?” asks one of them.
London, England. The place I’ve heard so much about. Like Paris, it’s a place many of us already have an impression of. Yet there are loads of surprises at every corner! Besides the stunning sights such as Big Ben and Parliament…
Ink: cajun craze, early espresso
Experience has taught me never to trust a policeman. Just when you think one’s all right, he turns legit.
This photo has more pavers than we're looking at, but I like the small retaining wall for a height variation, and added seating for those BBQs. I'm hoping to do some raised paver walls, if only in one area.
Giant chains, metal black and dull, held up a massive drawbridge, made of a deep, dark, thickly-planked wood, with nary a gap in between each plank. All ready in the morning there was heavy foot and cart traffic, with merchants coming into town with their wares.
It also, and perhaps most interesting to the copyright gurus reading this blog, explores in detail the ‘work for hire’ issue that will often be the deciding factor in whether a termination is successful or not. As the Guide points out, if a work was created as a work for hire, the person who created the work cannot reclaim the rights. This is because although they created the work, they are not the legal author. Authorship in works for hire vests with the hiring entity.
Over the past few months I've noticed various hacking attempts that come in spurts. I always review each of these and adjust my site to maintain protection. However, the malicious and persistent penetration attempts continue. Most originate in China but others are from South America, Eastern Europe, and Russia.
3. Burpees – 5
Islamabad has since closed NATO’s overland supply route and evicted the US military from the Shamsi airbase – restricting its successful drone campaign targeting al-Qa’ida and Taliban commanders in the Federally Administered Tribal Areas. “The onus is on the Americans to prove they are sincere and they can do so by trusting us, treating us with respect and honouring our sovereignty,” the security official said.
Garmin: Good and charged!
canvases of society women wrapped in fur.
The reason there was no excuse to make a poorly transforming Cliffjumper was that there was already an awesome Cliffjumper mold available. The First Edition Cliffjumper is great. I didn’t get the US version, or rather the tri-lingual version with a limited release in Canada. It is going for $90 or so on Amazon right now. So I got the Takara version. And I am very happy that I did. While the shoulders are not exactly cartoon accurate, I like them much better than the RID ones. The arms are solid, and don’t have that strange elongated look the RID version has. The arms also contain the best feature of this mold: the hands can flip around to be replaced by tri-barrel guns, just like the cartoon. This was not advertised or shown on the packaging, so I was completely surprised by this awesomeness. As far as I can tell, this is the only Transformers Prime toy that has cartoon accurate, integrated, transformable weapons. Another thing to note is that what happened to the RID versions arms and hands, happened to this versions legs and feet. The same parts that became the arms in the other version become the legs in the FE version. It looks a lot better this way. The only down side is that the feet are basically toes and don’t support the posability that the actual feet of the RID version do. Another great feature of the FE version is the chest is not faked like the RID version is. The roof of the car becomes the chest and the car headlights swing up to become part of the torso. The headlights don’t snap into place as well as I would like, so on mine, one side usually slides a little out of place. But I love that actual transformation occurs, instead of just folding back car parts to reveal robot parts. The main down side to the FE Cliffjumper so far is that I can’t quite get the car mode to fit together properly. While I have only worked on it for a little while so far, the sides of the car (robots unfolded legs) always bulge out. I am sure there is some minute bit of transformation detail that I have missed or done incorrectly, and with time I will figure it out. But if I am having this much trouble with it, others must also have had the same trouble. Assuming I can get the transformation worked out, this is my favorite Prime mold so far.
In a future post, I will cover some more highlights of the trip. Due to the high temps, it will likely be our last trip to the desert for the season. It's mountain and beach time now!
- Basic Beauty by Limoni - 103: it's totally a dupe of Zoya - Apple, it's totally beautiful, it's totally great quality, it totally became one of my favorite polish ever!
If you are lost, he is not.
“you don’t know that…technology and stuff…you just might go to the moon.”
My friend has all vintage clothing, purses, shoes oh and a pink poodle stuffed dog the size of a chair, that's big. It will be fun & interesting I'm sure. She said she sells everything from appliances to vintage bakelite jewelry to old formals. Here is a few items I have out so far
Do you want to know more about using social media to get sales?
The first couple of times you use a wok, there may be a slight metallic taste, but this will soon wear off. After each use, wash with hot water and detergent and dry thoroughly. At the beginning, rub with oil again. After a short while this will not be necessary and in time you will have a beautiful shiny black wok on which nothing will stick.
Our Republic is still young, and the vital principle underlying its organic structure should be maintained firm and strong, hard as the best of steel, so as to insure its growth and development along solid lines of a stable and vigorous democracy.
I know that some people can get a little freaked about by what I just laid out. They may be fearful that their visitors will get mad and will leave their site. And the truth is that can happen. But there is another truth you have to be aware of: upwards of 98% of your website visitors will never come back anyway.
There has been so much going on and you just continue to grow up so fast! It's starting to mesh all together. I need to start doing some weekly documenting!
I kept the baskets really simple this year:
When my daughter was born, one of the gifts we received was this cute little pinafore dress (with a floral top) in a size 0, which she's only just grown into in the last few months.
It makes me want to be on a boat in 80 degree weather. Like now.
I truly fell in love with doing hair in high school when at lunchtime I would do people’s hair in the bathroom. It started with braiding my best friends hair and it went on from there! The passion is creation and even better when people like it!
After 40 years:
existing or occurring in a high or extreme degree: intense heat.
- Those who know that they do not know
Gordon still has nightmares when he remembers the hundreds of charging desert horsemen he has been “asked” to draw over the years. The script by Cyril Walker is pretty good too, but we expected that of Cyril.
He doesn’t see the ugliness,
I honestly have no idea what I meant by the ‘What Play’ that’s written on my elementary school graduation picture. It must’ve been a popular phrase back then, but… Why would I have written that as my special talent?
more than the other. It is because one will dodge a camera like a mouse
In the Humble Botanicula Debut you’ll receive the following:
only dilemma here? their lyrics are LAME.
No, the TARDIS did not land in a dodgey Photoshop. This is Aberthaw Power Station in Wales which is run by RWE npower.
Maybe Hollywood has been lying to me all these years.
At the gate, I scan the faces of new arrivals. There’s an elderly gentleman holding his grandchild like she’s the most precious thing he’s ever seen. My eyes fix on the small bandage just by his left ear. Did he get grazed by falling bricks, or is it just one of the legion of small injuries the elderly get on a daily basis? Is it just my imagination or is there hope, fear and impatience etched on the faces of my fellow departing passengers?
15.07.08 CA Toronto, Drake Hotel
The current office of Bridge magazine opened its space this spring to a small group show tagged Mad Bad and Street Legal. There is no real basis for the title -- presumably it continues a Chicago gallery tradition of juxtaposing two ideas or statements to simply see what happens. Four artists are shown, and all run the gamut in their approaches to painting and drawing, sometimes navigating erudite literary references while at other times presenting quirky pop-culture references. The resulting show had a collaged, all over the place feel, but not one without many moments of delight.
It normally happens around my birthday. I take this time to realize, A) I’m getting older and closer to death B) I’ve achieved some of my goals I set out for myself as a naïve 18 year old man C) I need to redefine my goals and ambitions.
Also, bonus, as of today I have officially lost 12 pounds since I was last weighed the morning of my surgery. Granted, a clear liquid diet for 5 days followed by being too nauseous and weak to eat much of anything is probably not the best diet plan, but that is what happened and I plan to not let my suffering go to waste and remain on this weight loss trajectory, only maybe at a slightly more realistic pace.
What happens when there’s light in a dark place, even a little? Suddenly, many can see to walk from here to there. Imagine having to walk in the darkness from A to B for centuries, and suddenly there is a light on the path. There is no fear about the unknown when you can see in front of you! You’re free to unify, since you can see that the others are just like you! You’re free to have ideas. You’re free to have knowledge.
Over the years, and with acceleration worthy of a pissed French chauffeur, the ad business has been trying to rebrand. (They should do what they do to me when I rebrand - charge me six figures for a new typeface and a full-stop rotated by 45 degrees. That's always the fucking answer to my problems, apparently.)
At first, the killings seem random, but as Mulligan keeps digging into the state’s thriving sex business, strange connections emerge. Promised free sex with hookers if he minds his own business—and a beating if he doesn’t—Mulligan enlists Thanks-Dad, the newspaper publisher’s son, and Attila the Nun, the state’s colorful Attorney General, in his quest for the truth. What Mulligan learns will lead him to question his beliefs about sexual morality, shake his tenuous religious faith, and leave him wondering who his real friends are.
But this basic working class perspective can only find voice under the watchful eye of the facilitators who either limit the time of the revolutionary socialists during vox populi or rule such discussion out of order when they are interjected in other “logistical” or “action” oriented discussions. For revolutionary workers it is a basic understanding that politics and program precede action and logistics. This primacy of program is necessary to assure we know where we are going the actions should flow from the program and not visa-versa. Whereas the “tax the rich” demand based on the “greed” critique has emerged as the unifying direction of the movement, in absence of a real debate over program, this reformist program dominates. But as our experiment, with distribution of posters at the Laney march and as the applause our speaker received while calling for nationalization of banks and finance capital under workers control and for a workers party that fights for a workers government during a limited one and a half minute speech during a vox populi reveled, the participants in the movement are open to demands which challenge the rights of capital to control production. “Tax the rich” does not challenge that right!
#5 - Share/Donate. Contact my local library and see if they would do a Quimper display. Speak at my city's garden club and share the history of Quimper while demonstrating how to arrange flowers in Quimper vessels.
Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Stir in the melted butter into the drained cooked macaroni. Add the beaten eggs and whole milk along with the salt. Combine well; stir in cheese. Grease well a 1 1/2 quart casserole. Pour mixture into casserole. Bake for about 30 minutes or until firm but not dry.
to slay the tasks that fund my final pay
3. Get up at 12 and walk around the living room again, with the bag, until 1AM.
Bills. Any bill we pay every month, has a (mostly) set price and that is required of us. Includes: Mortgage, car payment, student loan, LOC, cable, cell phone, insurances, waste disposal, discover card, water/sewer, karate class, and Rylee's schooling expenditures.
The woman simply opened her hand bag, brought out a sachet of panadol, removed two tablets and swallowed with the bottle water she was with.
“Marge, are you HIV positive?” I asked. He stopped, raised his head and looked me in the eye. He didn't deny it; that was his answer.
Hope you like my first video! Will figure out how to film better.My camera kinda washes me out :(
Coral Springs High School high jumper Julia Frederick is the highest ranked high jumper in Florida. Her personal best is 5.6 feet and she is expected to do well in Thursday’s regional track meet. This meet will take place at Coral Springs High School starting in the afternoon of April 28. Both the women’s and men’s teams are expected to do very well in this meet and may qualify for the State Championships in Winter Park.
plus it's more classy than the clapper.
Seek advice from a physician who bases their practice on science based nutrition!
My apologies for being gone for so long, but I promise I'll be back very soon with lots of beautiful pictures of things growing inside and out. Until then, enjoy the warm weather and make some ice cream!
Guestrooms at Island Inn And Suites An Ascend offer safes and coffee/tea makers. Rooms have high-speed Internet access. Televisions are equipped with premium cable/satellite channels and pay movies. All units at this 3-star hotel have kitchens with microwaves and refrigerators. Additional amenities include hair dryers andirons/ironing boards. All guestrooms at Island Inn And Suites An Ascend are non-smoking.
The parking lot of the pharmacy was empty, except for me walking my bike and a woman walking to her car. She was in her late thirties, wearing a black and white cheerleader uniform with bright pink slippers. She shuffled along towards her car, carrying her latest refill of medications.
The ease of searching on the Internet has also sparked fears of blacklisting. Suppose you ask a question about an agent's background on a writers' message board. Suppose the agent does a websearch and finds your comment. Will the agent be pissed off--especially if you have something critical to say? Will she tell her colleagues? Will your name become mud?
As a result of the atheistic outcry against Christianity in particular, there has been an enormous response among the vast ranks of evangelicals. Notable apologists like Ravi Zacharias (author of The End of Reason) and president of SBTS Al Mohler (Atheism Remix) have written more popular level books in response to the New Atheism. Theologians like Alister McGrath (The Dawkins Delusion) and biblical scholars like Paul Copan (Is God A Moral Monster) have given their noteworthy contributions. Pastors like Doug Wilson (Is Christianity Good for the World) and Tim Keller (The Reason for God) have responded to the New Atheism with theological rigor and pastoral care. More philosophical responses have come from the likes of David Berlinski (The Devil’s Delusion) and famed William Lane Craig (God?: A Debate between a Christian and an Atheist) who have shown that the Biblical claims of Christianity can hold their own and more among philosophical doubters. Further, scientists like John Lennox (God’s Undertaker: Has Science Buried God?), Stephen C. Meyer (Signature in the Cell) and Francis Collins (The Language of God) have approached atheist’s attacks from their own world.
昆虫シリーズ完成しました。死んだ蝶を公園で見つけたのがきっかけでこのシリーズを始めました。つまり１個は本物の蝶です。
for poetry. That’s what most people think
“Maybe there’s been some mistake -” began the young man.
The wind blowing, the leaves
Ted looks down at a half empty bag of popcorn on the ground. He was getting to old for this job. As grounds keeper for the festival and hitting 75 in a few months he knew his years of bending down picking up other peoples crap was limited.
Cretan olive oil is a top quality oil with very low acidity (0-1), largely hand harvested, and traditionally produced. For as long as it remains in the hands of the 'people' and not the 'industry' it will retain it's superior quality. The extra Virgin Olive oil I use has a golden slightly green colour, and a exceptionally fine taste and aroma reflective of the good climate, fertile soil and ideal conditions for the prime development of the olive trees.
A gentleman
This post will tax the patience of some and disturb the complacency of others. It sets out the facts and reaches conclusions which some may find surprising. (Unless otherwise stated, all statistics may be verified at www.cso.ie .) It describes how, with careful rearrangement of our affairs and while remaining rigidly within the constraints of currently available resources, we can, within twelve months of commencement, achieve the following goals:
The month of November is upon us and, Guy Fawke’s Night (or Fireworks Night for the less traditional of you) aside, it might not sound like it’s going to be anything too special. From a gamer’s perspective, however, there’s a fair bit to be excited about. Surprisingly though, this article is not going to focus on the absolutely gargantuan number of titles that are about to flood store shelves in time for the Christmas rush, nor will it be a rant on how annoying I find the Call of Duty franchise (though I really must write about that sometime). Instead, the headline act for me this month is just one particular game, Sonic Generations – a joyous celebration of 20 years of Sonic the Hedgehog – but more specifically, how nostalgia plays such a big role in today’s society.
Gen 2:19-20
Mokdad’s family maintains that the killing was a tragedy that has nothing to do with their Islamic beliefs, according to a report in the Detroit Free Press.
repressive political instrument
Did I tell you about the illnesses and missing school pictures? Or about Grady eating mud? Or about the 75 tulip bulbs I planted and 15 bags of mulch I just spread around the front yard?
No sex drive (Really? But I feel so puffy, fatigued, and severely constipated! That TOTALLY puts me in the mood usually.)
For those of you who I am fortunate enough to love as family and friends, for those of you who I'll hope to meet someday, somewhere in the future, and for all of my newfound friends from around the globe who meet me in cyberspace, I am thankful that all of you are in my world.
Marie-Angélique Bueler, composer, studied at the University of Sussex and at the University of York. Her compositions have led to a whole host of orchestral performances including Dust Parade and Shiny Blues. Adding to the mix, Refry for solo accordion and Tumbling in Time, a spectacular duet for Chinese flute and Western flute, are evocative, timeless works representing only a tiny corner of her deliberations with sound.
weighty wrenches
Sodium Steroyl Lactylate – See Lactic Acid.
Unless you are one of those people who never travels 10 miles from their place of birth, you probably like to travel. Travel is something most people tend to enjoy. It gives us a completely new environment with new experiences, new entertainment, and new people. This new place may be filled with wonders completely unheard of before in your own culture, but that are commonplace in this new world.
20. CD Repo Man - Aqua Bats
"There was a time in my life when I was really unhappy and the only thing that made me happy was a pair of new shoes." Beth Shak, Shoe Collector
Troubled he discussed the visions which he came to interpret as a call to found an order dedicated to ransom Christian prisoners taken hostage in the Mediterranean.
We decided to experiment with planting some broad bean seeds to see if they will grow in the same conditions as the cress and basil seeds. We planted these in clear plastic containers so that we can see any changes that happen. We monitored our broad bean seeds and this is what we found: on Friday 27th April we planted the seeds; on Wednesday 2nd May they had started to open; on Thursday 3rd of May the roots had started to come down and now on Friday 4th of May the roots are much longer!
Capable, time will tell.
The Beast from 20,000 Fathoms (1953) was already a few years old by the time I saw it, at a Saturday kiddie matinee at the Stamm Theatre in Antioch, Calif. I don't remember exactly when that was, but I do know I saw it at least three or four times, all of them well before The 7th Voyage of Sinbad came to the same theater in early 1959. (I also know it was after I saw King Kong on its 1956 reissue, so that narrows things down a little.)
He walks along-side his doe-eyed donkey
In terms of people you would know, Amanda Seyfried was a treat to work with on ’Jennifer’s Body’. She’s insanely talented and completely down to earth. Cuba Gooding Jr. (‘Hardwired’) was also a class act and very generous as an actor. I also got my ass kicked by Joshua Jackson in ’Fringe’…literally. We did a fight scene together and I got to do my own stunts on that one. He was a good man. Although it wasn’t really with an “actor,” getting my head blown off by a predator in ‘AVP2′ was a highlight too.
Alert charting.
Tour Date: April 20
To avoid insect and disease problems, wash the gravel and use top-quality, sterile potting soil. Fill the bottom of the container with about ½”-1 inch of gravel. Next add about ½” to ¾’of charcoal, this helps keep the soil sweet and not sour, which can cause disease. Top the charcoal with 3 inches of soil. Now comes the fun part: planting the “landscape”. Select varieties of plants that all have the same growing needs when it comes to light, water and humidity. Slow growers with small leaves are best suited.
And greater, your pain, if you hear, once more,
Heather Trim, People for Puget Sound, Toxics, Seattle Zero Waste
While that's taken care of, make the ganache.
Oh one man came to me
“Pa must be off the wagon…”
Told you it was a fab sketch, I know you will love playing with it. My teamies as always have created some amazing inspiration for you all. Looking forward to checking out your lovely creations.
David Scott Agnes, 46, New York, N.Y.
Cut out the two separate pieces in your primary fabric. I used a lightweight black and white polka dot. Pin the edges of the circular section to bottom of the cone section and sew circumferentially with the seams on the inside, leaving a 1 inch section open for stuffing. Then sew the edges of the cone section together, with the seam facing inward. Make sure you don't sew the entire cone edge to the circle. Turn the whole thing inside out. You should have a rough cone shape with a small opening hatch at the bottom.
Greece is just the first of many and her bail out is the equivalent of being thrown a life line from a sinking ship, they may drag her back on deck for now, but we’ll all go down together in the end.
Find an example of graphic design from the 1920s or 1930s to submit.
Thumb-sized piece of ginger
Both Selsor and Dodson had records when arrested for murdering Clayton. Plus, Selsor told police they’d committed four robberies before the one they weren’t arrested for. In previous robberies, they stabbed the clerk and shot another with a shotgun.
Hi everybody i hope you are all well and getting excited for Christmas! I've been so busy at school cos i had assessments and then rehearsals for our Christmas play so i haven't had time to do any blogging. We finished school this week so i managed to finish my brothers' Christmas presents..........do you remember i made 1 a few weeks ago?............well these are the other 3! i have 5 brothers (EEk!) so i made 4 bookmarks and a wall hanging..............i hope they like them! The picture above is of the 3 i made this week and the picture below is of the 1 i made before. They are all made the same just different colours and words. I printed out words then matted and layered onto coloured card then cut a star and put each boys name on.
At that point things changed: Johnny began to walk me! It didn’t take me long to get the hang of it, though — remember, I am the one who was doing all the learning here! I’ve walked my parent’s Dachshund many times, but Rusty doesn’t have near the amount of energy of a Jack Russell! Johnny was fun, and I enjoyed his upbeat energy.
Realizing how many years he had worked in baseball, I asked him about some of the favorite parks he had visited.
A. We’ve discussed this a lot internally and even brainstormed a few analogies. People predicted blogging services would die with the rise of Facebook. But that hasn’t happened because they’re not similar services. WordPress.com is Web publishing, not social networking. What is created on WordPress is shared via social networking.
And, as the aliens made their pitiless, disgusting demands, I could hear distant echoes of the Opium Wars of the 1840s, when Britain declared war on China to ensure the maintenance of its drug-trade with the celestial Empire. How dare the Chinese government attempt to stem the growth of commerce (meaning, in this case, the creation of vast armies of opium addicts in all their major trading ports)!
St. Louis, Missouri
Doctor: “Oh, yes, Celiac. Well, they usually have some real symptoms.”
I think I did so also to reconnect to this part of my life, to rekindle the fire, or to awaken the ‘pintele Yid’. The Jewish spark as it were.
The old women can keep moving, when people who went too hard are winded.
Science Fiction, by its nature, tends to travel some dark roads. None darker, I fear, than a single, disturbing question: Why Do We Matter?
I was crying for the someone of someone I knew............
I'll try to be more proactive and run a post here when Matt publishes my pieces on ABN but for now, here is a link to his very good beer site.
This continues back into Customer Service: if, as an employee, you listen to a customer’s problem intently, but do nothing for them afterwards – it’s useless. You have to be an advocate for your customer and their problem. Acting toward the solution posed by their words that you’ve taken to heart.
"Bernard of Chartres used to say that we are like dwarfs on the shoulders of giants, so that we can see more than they, and things at a greater distance, not by virtue of any sharpness of sight on our part, or any physical distinction, but because we are carried high and raised up by their giant size."
“You are sucking,” Ernie corrected him. “It’s the present continuous, remember.”
I've got nothing to say, which is odd for me. I've been busy though, busier than I thought I would be after the show. The weather turned nice so we have some yard work and gardening to do. It's taking a while though because we've had guests and stuff on the weekends. But I am glad to report that the 3 holly trees that I can't stand are finally down! Now, we just have to clean up the debris.
This guide should help you to survive out there in the real world. If people don’t agree with these methods – tell them to, “Sssshhhht!”, make lobster-pincer-fingers, and yank their rope away.
I’m very fond of Newcastle. After much travelling I made a conscious decision to return here because I missed it, and while, in the current season of bone aching cold* and bitter winds and relentless rain, I quite often wonder what the hell I was thinking I do still love it and just the sight of Tyne Bridge on my way home every night makes me warm inside, even when I can’t actually feel my extremities anymore because its so bloody horrifically cold. (*Note on cold for any non –Newcastle residents or other aliens: People from Newcastle do not feel the cold, they are just that damn hard. In Newcastle, irrespective of the temperature outside, it is forbidden to wear a coat/jacket/any manner of protection against the elements. One must only wear a t shirt if male or a very small piece of fabric that could be described as a ‘dress’ if female. It’s just how things are. I’ve been wearing furs (faux, of course) since August. I’m an anomaly in my city).
B - Waffles
Louise:- My name is Louise, I live in gorgeous New Zealand. I am a stay at home mum to my 3 beautiful children who I love to take photos of and do layouts on. My family and I live on a very small farm where we have some sheep and cattle. I have been scrapbooking since 2005 when I had my first child. I would say my style is pretty clean and crisp although I love to experiment with different techniques. My pages normally don't take a huge amount of time as I am so limited in the time I get to spend doing papercrafts. I also enjoy stamping, cardmaking and beading.
No passions.
#2 doubles Tim Niehart and Eddie Adkins defeated D. Frantz and M. Hall (6-1) (6-2)
The story was a mix of everything teen drama, action, danger, high emotions and lots of secrets and lies and it was all put together in a beautiful and imaginative way that kept me hooked the whole way through.
Like piano keys
Davros will also make an appearance
No, they really are over the top! But that's not why they're called that. Apparently there's a cookie shop in Salt Lake called Over the Top Cookies and this is a copycat of one of their cookies. I've never had the original version, but I do know these are good. Better than good! Light, crispy outside, soft, gooey inside...not to mention they're quite a bit bigger than normal cookies. I know. Perfect cookie, right?
Or I could just say “phooey” with the whole interpretation book and conclude this dream was about an unfulfilled need. The need for green things. The need for flowers. The need for days above 50 degrees Fahrenheit and nights above freezing. And mostly, the need for the lingering layer of unwholesome-looking, feces-, twig-, and gravel-ridden snow to finally melt. Even wet, brown grass would be an improvement.
My Dreamy Bunny Necklace. I bought it for myself for my birthday. That must have been 2 years ago. It was outrageously expensive but I wear it so often, it was worth the money. At the moment I'm obsessed with red outfits and somehow the mint and pink fits quite good with the red outfits.
I decided to join in on 5QF since it is fun and easy and doesn't require much thinking...I do too much of that when it comes to school lol
- And/Or tweet this giveaway, (you must be a follower on twitter for this entry to count!) - for 1 entry
wants to ensure any kind of stability in the country and the region after the troops are officially pulled out, the struggle for the hearts and minds of as many Afghans as possible is more vital now than ever.
It’s a nesting doll of various Israeli memes. The outermost doll is a builder, with Zionism being an ideology of building. It’s nice that there are still people out there who after all these years still think of themselves as builders of civilization. Most of us in the West prefer to deconstruct. Then we have a businessman and a soldier as well as two undiscernable figures. I love the fact that the smallest figure is that of a little boy because it speaks to the idea of generational continuity and the eternal life of the Jewish people.
Jan 20
I am amazed,
Five rounds for time of:
Some people could stand to stand a bit more. I could stand to do a little more sitting. I'm learning.
In order to do this I have had to mark two sets of papers - one before an author visit and one after.
Love says it all.
answers
June 17, 2011 — Entomologist called by the defense states if there was a body in the trunk, there should have been hundreds or even thousands of blow flies trapped in the trunk as well.
I enjoy Borderlands because it’s entertainment you can “dip” into. It doesn’t have a particularly demanding story. Some might say the story is something of an afterthought. But that’s not important. In fact, that’s what makes it so “dip-friendly”, if that’s even a term. Because you never feel like you’ve lost the plot (literally) and there’s always something in the mission log to go and do, it can be months between play sessions and you can still have a good time with it regardless. I still haven’t finished the game with a single character, but I do enjoy going back to it time and time again, whether it’s solo, with a split-screen partner or with some companions on Xbox LIVE. In fact, I’ve played it far too little online, as it’s great fun in multiplayer. But for me at least, it’s evergreen entertainment. I can happily go back to it. If you still have a copy, hit me up. I have a level 31 Siren just waiting to show you a good time.
The Kuru hero then addressed Vasudeva of mighty arms. ”Bhishma said, ‘O holy one, O god of all gods, O thou that art worshipped by all the Devas and Asuras, O thou that didst cover the three worlds with three steps of thine, salutations to thee, O wielder of the conch, the discus, and the mace! Thou art Vasudeva, thou art of golden body, thou art the one Purusha, thou art the creator (of the universe), thou art of vast proportions. Thou art Jiva. Thou art subtle. Thou art the Supreme and eternal Self. Do thou, O lotus-eyed one, rescue me, O foremost of all beings! Do thou, give me permission, O Krishna, to depart from this world, O thou that art Supreme felicity, O foremost of all beings! The sons of Pandu should ever be protected by thee. Thou art, indeed, already their sole refuge. Formerly, I spoke to the foolish Duryodhana of wicked understanding that thither is Dharma where Krishna is, and that there is victory where Dharma is. I further counselled him that relying on Vasudeva as his refuge, he should make peace with the Pandavas. Indeed, I repeatedly told him, ‘This is the fittest time for thee to make peace! The foolish Duryodhana of wicked understanding, however, did not do my bidding. Having caused a great havoc on earth, at last, he himself laid down his life. Thee, O illustrious one, I know to be that ancient and best of Rishis who dwelt for many years in the company of Nara, in the retreat of Badari. The celestial Rishi Narada told me this, as also Vyasa of austere penances. Even they have said unto me that. Thyself and Arjuna are the old Rishis Narayana and Nara born among men. Do thou, O Krishna, grant me leave, I shall cast off my body. Permitted by thee, I shall attain to the highest end!’
Line from Jenna of Lena Dunham's Girls, the naturalistic Brit-bohemian, rejecting the artifice of a pink barnes and noble relationship help book. Today I do have udders, I am a sore, mooing cow, it doesn't feel the least bit sexy, to be so full and vulnerable. I am watching Girls, I am trying to essay for this essay on Girls and girls and girls, but instead I am finding most pleasure holding forth on Facebook with the likes of Kate Durbin and Feng Chen, who just wrote a great piece on the Girl for Montevidayo, in reference to Olivia Cronk's Skin Horse, which I want to read and still haven't.
I have sadly already packed up an entire tote of things they have outgrown. Today I am going to add all of their cute Christmas outfits to it. I honestly cannot believe how big they are getting.
NOT considered cheating? Well, not only is it considered cheating by me, it's considered to be completely fucked up.
So, I ordered some of the pens online, along with a tub of the paint they make, and bought myself a few plain white cups and bowls. The cups and such can be bought fairly cheap, and it’s easy enough to remove the paint if you make a mistake, so it’s not going to be an expensive disaster if things go wrong. Which they did.
I have to admit this is a challenge for us many nights. The school activities and sports have ramped up now that my boys are in junior high, and some weeks I fear they are turning into renovation orphans. Our construction schedule is running a few weeks ahead (I know!), which means we've got to make certain decisions ASAP, which means we're running out to Lowes or Home Depot, or the lighting store or the tile store shortly after DH gets home so that we don't slow down the amazing progress our builder is making.
Can you imagine the uproar? It could be argued even that it’s a compliment. Like… Sandy Koufax implemented the talents of his race to mow down the cubs.
How do you defy destiny?
So..... off to Michaels I went.
Beat sugar into eggs until thickened and pale yellow. Beat in cornstarch and set aside.
With this first book Hands creates a breathtaking new angle on Angels and their purposes on earth. With such remarkable characters and beautiful attention to details the writing will captivate readers and transport them into the beauty of Jackson Hole, Wyoming. (As someone who’s spent quite a bit of their life in the area I know the author has done a wonderful job.) Slow it may be, but your heart will beat with adrenaline, love, pain, and heartache. Unearthly hints at the unending battle between good and evil and tantalizes readers with a taste of angelic mystery.
u love,give to people u want to see more of,give
20. Do you have any weird food habits?
"Don't worry, my friend. We'll find a home. We'll find a nice new home for you." And, as an afterthought he added, "Why, with your good looks, we'll have no trouble at all. Anyone would be proud to own such a fine dog."
Abby sighed as they walked toward the end of the line. “Thought of that, jah. But findin’ her perty new dress cut up on her closet floor–”
without apparent cause
Anyway,….. this is just great.
Extra clothing including hat and gloves
To: info@draftfcb.com
OBJECTION TO THE ADOPTION OF RESTRICTIVE LEGISLATION OR POLICY OPTIONS FREQUENTLY
Where will they find a head that is suitable for Baron's specific needs? How about a bordello? It just happens that the Baron knows the location of one. The Baron and his lab assistant stake out the entrance of a local bordello, and wait for a body sporting the right kind of head to walk out the door. Luckily for the Baron, Nicholas (Joe Dallesandro), a viral stableboy, and his friend Sacha (Srdjan Zelenovic), a wannabe monk who despises sexual intercourse, are getting their orgy needs fulfilled by a gaggle of affable prostitutes, well, Nicholas is anyway; Sacha is basically sulking in the corner, pressing his unlicked penis against the modestly hairy surface of his Serbian inner thighs.
(it melted my heart x)
Grubbs even indulges himself by doing an imitation of Duan Eddy's "twang" in Ursus Arctos Wonderfilis, unsurprisingly producing that atmospheric tone in simple arrangements and dynamic structures that recall the inspirational jams by John Fahey.
Enlight Remaster details: All tracks are normalized in volume with aprox -10dB (down), using an adaptive mode ( no peak to peak or replaygain is used)! Strong noise removed 50%nl-12.0dB reduction, some crackles has been removed -10% , peak restoration between -0.5 and -1.9!. for the cleaning part, some eq change are carefully made, Stereo has been vitalized with 7.5-12.5 % max., right and left channels are balanced. Overall dynamic loudness +27.5% high-quality mode, this makes the sound smoother, but still keeps its rawness. Nothing has been add /edited to or out the original source for tapers respect!!
Next: The importance of a sense of control to your wellbeing.
To put those figures in further perspective, Greeks worked more hours than any other people in the European Union; only South Koreans worked more among the world’s advanced capitalist countries.
laundromat in Gillette, Wyoming
It was mostly the young people of this nation who elected Obama and the Democratic Congress. You fell for the “Hope and Change” which in reality was nothing but “Hype and Lies.”
Favourite Flower: Tulip
my wardrobe right now is too coherent
“You left too. So you took the easy way out too. What about that?” she yelled back at me.
We'll be in the new flat by September 11. I know I should be doing more in preparation, but right now.....nah. (See, that no is workin' rather well for me right now.)
In that scenario, simply following up the Olympics with the same site for the World Championships two years later, would ensure that a) a proper vetting process would have already taken place in the selection process; b) that the host site would have the best facilities available for Worlds, given that they would have been prepared with the Games themselves in mind; and c) the sport would get adequate exposure throughout the world – right now we’re looking at China, Britain, and Brazil if Rio were next in line.
Q: What is Stirred about?
They’re operating with style, both the French publisher and the old woman. Would it work? I don’t think I’m brave enough to try.
And the Mouse? What can I tell you about Miss Maisie, who is nearly 13 months old? Well, in the past 24 hours, she has learned to high-five (something she is inordinately proud of! We get a toothy grin every time), and has figured out how to call the dog. This morning, we heard a breathy little "Di-see? Di-see?" as she called Daisy from her cot. Thankfully, the dog doesn't understand her yet...She has also learned to wave bye-bye, which is very cute especially when she waves a little starfish hand frantically, while shouting "Ta-ta!!" With the eight teeth, and the bandy legs trying to stand, and the long sticky-uppy hair, she's getting so very, very big...
to beat her curfew at dawn.
It should not happen in our society. It should not be allowed to happen at all.
54 Therefore, it must be concluded that the terms ‘cargo’ and ‘partner’ are generic words which are accordingly not capable of distinguishing the applicant’s services from those of other undertakings.
Reverse Osmosis Water Filtration Systems
By Adele
I love them too and want to share them here:
NOVEMBER - The Weixlers are an extremely musical bunch. Every year on the second Sunday in December we have a family music program. It is such a wonderful event ... and everyone brings LOTS of delicious goodies (I traditionally bring caramel popcorn ... which my husband reminds me makes a MESS to clean up afterwords, but I don't care as everyone gobbles it up!)
This costume has a head piece, and it is called a french hood ( it has many other names I believe but that is what it is called in the book where I got the pattern)
Every minute.
I don't know why it happened that on this occasion I was more than ever struck with that queer air of sociability, of the cousinship and family life, which makes up half the expression of Venice. Without streets and vehicles, the uproar of wheels, the brutality of horses, and with its little winding ways where people crowd together, where voices sound as in the corridors of a house, where the human step circulates as if it skirted the angles of furniture and shoes never wear out, the place has the character of an immense collective apartment, in which Piazza San Marco is the most ornamented corner, and palaces and churches for the rest, play the part of great divans of repose, tables of entertainment, expanses of decoration.
Flour- 1 cup
"Just leave me alone.", you say. The bell rings for the end of the day and you can't get to the bus fast enough. Julie follows you to the bus, calling you names and pushing you from behind. Stupid. Whore. Slut. You know as soon as you board, you'll be safe. You may not be a fighter but you will not show her your weak. You never cry. Not in front of her.
OK, thanks for listening. See you for my next session in a couple days.
Today two of my girls were having a little disagreement. We're working a lot on problem solving in our classroom, so I decided to just sit back and watch them work it out. I could see that they were not making any progress, so I started moving in their direction to help them. When I got there, I could see that one of the girls was getting pretty angry.
The butterflies continue to emerge from the chrysalises we over-wintered. We have only one remaining un-hatched chrysalis. I was tracking a caterpillar on our fennel, but lost it after it shed its skin. I've got my eye on a few eggs, and perhaps we'll collect and raise some more caterpillars this season.
He added his own feet which I'm thinking was only to show the world how bad I need a tan. Sigh.
I notice his lips beginning to twitch.
If you haven't had the HONOR of meeting TEAM LARSON, please head over to http://carepages.com/, register (it's free and takes, like, 2 seconds!) Click on Visit and type in ColemanScott (all one word). He will be your new boyfriend! Promise to pray for his healing! OK...I am off to re-do the Gosselin NAMESAKE that took me 4 hours to do yesterday...it just wasn't right....but I think I got in now! Trying to finish 4 a day! Wishful thinking, right? I need some cheerleaders, please! ;)
2) Know The Difference Between Needs And Wants. Understanding and accepting this difference makes developing good financial habits easier
1487680416
Bulletproof vests are now required if you want to go to work, the store, church, visit grandma etc.. Because Orcs (non-Whites) aren't going to challenge you to a shootout in the middle of the street at high noon.
After all these years of mediocrity, the Leafs thought they had something this season. They retained a playoff berth until February the 24th, and were not eliminated for contention until March. But by dropping 22 of their last 29 games this season, a historic collapse occurred and the Leafs fell short of the NHL for a seventh-straight season.
For the flowers I stamped them in versamark and then heat embossed with black embossing powder. I then punched it out and burnished with the pretty in pink stampin pastels. I thought about just stamping it on the blushing bride paper, but I like the effect of burnshing for this card better, I like the subtlety of it. Even though there isn't a blushing bride stampin pastel (because it's an in colour) the pretty in pink is a pretty good substitute. Well, thanks for hanging out and checking out my card. Looking forward to more posts!!
Place 1½ cups sugar and cream cheese in the bowl of your stand mixer.(you will use the other 1/2 cup later for rolling the cookies in before baking:)
These objections or concerns, the Act says, must be taken into consideration when the police, under section 15, list their conditions down to the rally organisers for the said event.
Work on my slow cloth
The only major character with a flaw is Hugh, and his only flaw is that he’s naive and easily led. Miss Fisher’s Murder Mysteries is reminding me an awful lot of last year’s Wild Boys. Wild Boys was also a fluffy, enjoyable-if-you-don’t-think-about-it-too-much, mostly forgettable series populated by way-too-nice good guys and scenery chewing bad guys. I thought Miss Fisher’s was supposed to be the sexy, fun, adult murder mystery series not afraid to take risks and yet it gives us this sterile, white bread, drag of a show with these goody-goody characters who are always on the side of the angels. I don’t need every character in every television show to be Walter White or Tony Soprano, but it would be good if they had some character traits that seemed like they could possibly belong to an actual human being.
Kim Wilde Kids in America UK
Barb from Turtles and Tails shared this easy tutorial on how to make these really cute bulletin boards. This is just the thing I'm wanting to make to sit above my desk. I'm very much a visual person and if something's not jumping off the wall, in my face, I don't or won't remember it. Thanks Barb for linking up. Great idea and tutorial!
My very favorite of muses
So one segregation system has been brazenly replaced by another and the base of power has simply transferred to another inept, corrupt and incompetent set of individuals who then have the audacity to proclaim that the masses have been liberated by them. The poor are arguably worse off than during apartheid. The fact is that the Nats still built houses for the blacks at a greater rate than the current government!
Tomatoes go into a saucepan with some oil and some salt. The point of this is to break the tomatoes down into a sauce which will later permeate the stew. This will take about 15-20 minutes at medium heat.
it’s the staying power he lacks.
It also has a shed space of 14000 sq/ft. It also has other basic facilities like water supply and power of 65hp.
More recently it has been the popular media.
Without Limits (Robert Towne & Kenny Moore)
Unfortunately for Destinee she did not heed her mother’s parental warning. There were no lights alit behind the ‘Black Swan’ that evening.
But GREEN was fashionably late, booze in hand and dancing on the tables by night's end, with an overwhelming 102 votes! I bucked the majority on the Pink vs Navy Doors....but I jumped on the bandwagon this time!
He was arrested in May last year as he attempted to seek asylum at the German embassy following a crackdown on Christians within Afghanistan.
Some look to the future and see a civil war, but that is not the answer, certainly its not the answer now. The time may come when war is inevitable, it will be imposed upon us and by then it may be too late. Before then, with all that is ranged against us we could not win a civil war fought now. Violence is not the answer and all those who have tried it so far have failed and have merely made our situation worse.
I am starting to think I am worng. SO wrong that I see people around me who are moving up and they have less experience or the same as I do but they are making more money and have better titles. Not that I am a title groupe but seriously–they don’t make them for nothing.
Protection of IP rights was mentioned too, as playing a ‘vital role’ in ‘encouraging independent innovation and optimising a favourable environment for innovation and invention’. Protection is not surprisingly ‘also beneficial to reducing international IP conflicts’.
And the booze at the end. Don’t forget about the booze.
When it comes to social playlists I think Rdio is first, and MOG is second. Rhapsody and Napster aren’t in the running.
* Entry deadline is MAY 2ND
If you have 3 minutes and a microwave, you have perfect brown rice. Could not live without this stuff!
3 paid
Mortgage rates are at their lowest and make buying affordable to many. Beware analysts expect rates to rise any day now, so if you are wondering if you should buy or wait, Now is the time.
Three Years ago today was our very first Challenge at Charisma Cardz Challenges!
At the mongrel dogs who teach
BILL DE BLASIO DEMANDS GREATER ACCOUNTABILITY IN RESPONSE TO POLICE SHOOTINGS
Today, I’d like to encourage you to do the same thing. Maybe you’re a busy mom, a working mom or a woman on her own unique journey. Wherever you are, I encourage you to give yourself grace-- not just for one day, but every day. Ever morning, the Lord gives us new opportunities to surrender it all to him and I encourage you to do just that. Take the day and give yourself grace!
Anyway, enough of the cooking stuff. Here’s a couple of pieces I’ve made over the last few days.
He killed me, but I still walk here, he hurt me more than words could ever say
Soloist: Simon Standage
10. You had your chance as a President, but have failed on each and every count.
3) Significance
My foot slipped completely out in front of me causing me to do a sort of split. I went down, landing hard on my other knee and falling into the occupied chair in front of me. As quickly as I could, I apologized to the woman I had accosted and slid into my chair. A few seconds later the lights went out.
The interesting thing is that a lot of people I've read via online blogs or comment boards are pretty much what I expected them to be when I have gotten to know them. In some instances....their typed words amplify the person they are, but for the most part, I've gravitated to those I feel are good, honest people.
any project with Mom in mind.
She trips, tangles, and the film ends.
Add 8 items to your shopping cart and then enter the code STRAWBERRY
On the golden horizon
A friend asked about an eggless sugar cookie and, though this is not a sugar cookie, it came to mind. The kids love these!
She is also in love with me. I can tell because of the way she ignores me and how hard to get she's playing.
These are words to inspire us as well. All Britons have the right to resist tyranny, home-grown or foreign, with all means at their disposal. There may come a time where there is no other option. It strikes this author as wholly proper and reasonable that what, in the case of England and then Britain, has taken centuries to build, should continue to inspire the devotion and loyalty of its citizens; that we do have obligations to protect what has been bequeathed to us by time and place; that it is right and proper that we honour our dead; that vast numbers of aliens cannot simply join our tribe and family. Otherwise we, the white indigenous population, and our children, will lose everything. The Conservative Party which used to believe in the sanctity of nation has lost its soul and betrayed us all. Now, this party conspires to reduce us to a mass of human refuse, little better than savages, at the mercy of fate and the racist gloating of the BBC, so that we are the plaything of every apparatchik and venal politician-prostitute.
March 25th (Sunday) : Kobe
I had no idea that my picky seven year old would like salad.
silver spacecraft, a Rebel Beer Wagon known as a Growler, firing
However on a purely personal level I have some concerns about the audit-“ability” of eBooks supplied to the customer by resellers. The business model in play here is fundamentally the same as that of the Amazon Advantage programme – where stock is supplied on consignment and paid for in retrospect. The eBook reselling model works in very much the same way, with the HUGE exception that the electronic file is obtained from the eBook aggregator once and once only. We are placing huge levels of trust in both the moral compass and – more importantly – the robustness of the distribution, recording and reporting technologies used by eBook resellers. I work in the supply chain and I have to report back to my clients daily about their sales. And I know from experience that reporting systems don’t always do what you think you have instructed your I.T. people tell them to do. In the word of print books we have the checks and balances of physical stock movements to audit our reporting. I am unsure what the checks and balances in the eBook reselling world are.
Teachta Adams said: “It is quite clear Austerity doesn’t work. We’ve had six Austerity budgets in the last four years and the deficit has grown not reduced.
3. Debbie
IdolMaster: 417
Our children need to have their own relationship with their father. If we step in when it's nothing to do with us, we can create tension that is harder for the child to cope with than the actual way their father was parenting them in the first place! Dayna told a story of a time when Joe, her husband, was getting really angry at Tiff and "not handling it very well". Dayna intervened, saying something along the lines of how he shouldn't talk to her like that and TIFFANY, the daughter, cries out, "Mum, stop!" She was more upset by her mother's effort to bring peace than she was by the angry way her father was dealing with her.
The real cause of the fire is the brownness of the bamboo itself. Similarly the real cause of all the kings dying in the Mahābhārata war is their own foulness. Our own deaths and misfortunes are also not caused by random fate. Fate is merely the friction enabled by the abundance of brown reeds in our mentality. As for God, his part in our suffering or fortune is extremely remote. He is merely the wind that blows impartially everywhere. The real cause of our misfortunes is not being “green bamboo,” not being rooted into the soul of divinity. Misusing our freewill to uproot ourselves from our true nature, we become dry and brown – and it is then only a matter of time before we are burnt.
One of the wonderful ones came this evening from my best friend who I also consider my little sister, Jazz. She pointed out something that I and my Mr. have known for a while…
I decided to add some Corrugated Kraft Box in the background and *ink distressed* the edges with White Ink. Following the Sketch I added a Doily and some Prima Flowers. Next I embellished the card with some Yellow Rhinestone Brads, Chocolate Kaiser Pearls, some Yellow/White Gingham Ribbon., a Button with Brown Scrapper's Floss.
I have spoken to many people who feel that “Stop The Islamisation Of Europe” is a provocative banner that smacks of racial/religious intolerance. They are foolish and naive, but they are probably in the majority in our brainwashed isles. We must appeal to the majority.
Rising Star. In English, two words; Star and Rising. Now who is a star? A star in the simplest language is someone who excels.
So I’ll be moving out soon. Yes I am! Unfortunately not to the apartment I talked about before, there was a young couple with a baby checking the apartment as well so we pretty much knew it there and then that we were not going to get it. Fortunately another similar apartment with a reasonable rent came along, so we applied for that the same day we found out we didn’t get the first apartment. It was a funny little aparment because I had lived in those buildings when I first moved to this town 15 years ago and the layout was exactly the same as in our old apartment. The buildings had been recently renovated when we first moved in and apparently they hadn’t been touched since, as you could tell by the looks of the yard and the balconies. But did I mention the rent was pretty cheap?
I watched out for him when we were young and in spite of that he managed to get into all sorts of mischief. Once, when my mom was very pregnant with our little sister, he climbed on top of the roof and stood at the edge shouting "One, Two, Three, Jump! " He had a little Shetland pony named Solo who was mean as could be but Donnie loved that little guy even though he would run him into barbed wire fences or bite his butt when he was getting on him. He broke his leg on a glider and rolled a pick-up truck years before he was old enough to have a license and once slid down a flagpole with some almost disastrous results but always managed to keep that smile on his face.
All their eyes look skyward,
So, if I was participating in this judge-off, the biggest improvement would be 1983 to 1984, with 1986 to 1987 as runner-up. The biggest bust would be 1985 to 1986, with 1995 to 1996 or 1982 to 1983 as runners-up.
It was a great adventure and I congratulate each student for creating a one-of-a-kind book. And a suntacular beam of thanks to the parents for the delicious space-themed goodies!
By making money with surveys, you don’t need any technical skills or experience to use these survey sites and there are no risks involved. Depending on how much you put into this, paid surveys could really help contribute towards your financial security and more.
¾ tsp. cornstarch
Hubby and son realize that the side effects of the weeklong exam preparation are still prevalent.
So I stumbled forward with the rest of the crowd, without much will or strength left, till we found ourselves herded into a long dark metal box. They packed us into this container tightly, leaving no room to spare, and then swung the door shut, locking us in.
Done with our exploration of the Beata, we swim toward the Island Seal/Joey D. As we survey the length of this sunken barge we notice that she sank upside down and there’s a gap of maybe three feet between the deck, which is the downside of the wreck, and the smooth sand bottom. A bit past midway along the length of this wreck, Ria heads under it crosswise, a distance of about 60’. Oh my! Ben was first in line behind her and later confessed that he hesitated a moment (or two), imagining the possibility of a strong current or undersea quake shifting the wreck and eliminating that 3-foot gap while he was under the boat.
-$2/1 mq 10.23.11 SS
I have no access to what Kerr wrote since that requires a fee, but it should be remembered that the musicals of Prince and Sondheim in the 1970s marked a bit of a changing of the guard. Barnes, whose first love had always been as a dance critic, had reviewed dance at various publications since 1953 and theater, film and television since 1956. Walter Kerr, himself an occasional writer of plays and musicals, whose collaboration with his wife Jean Kerr, Goldilocks, won two Tonys in 1958, seven years after he'd first began a job as a theater critic, also taught speech and drama at The Catholic University of America. Don't see any conflicts there. Still, it didn't stop him from getting a Pulitzer Prize in Criticism for his theater reviews in 1978. Thankfully, the Old Guard didn't represent everyone in 1971. In fact, it prompted another writer at The New York Times, Martin Gottfried, to pen a contrary opinion on the new musical in the same newspaper that ran Barnes' and Kerr's pans. Gottfried wrote on April 25, 1971:
Here are six truths I have learned over the past eighteen years as a teacher. These are things I wish someone had sat me down and told me about when I started.
My children, as I said, are too young for any of this to matter to them. Whatever their orientation, I hope that the world they grow into is less hateful than Pastor Harris.
MOVIE QUOTE: Ben Carson: “The mirrors. They’re so clean.”
“Well, we could put your dad,” I answered.
I just returned from a week-long photo trip to Great Smoky Mountain National Park. Oh my, I hardly know where to begin. If you are a landscape, nature, or macro photographer, I truly believe you could spend every day photographing for a full year and not come close to exhausting the wonderful photographic opportunities this park offers.
The children seemed to agree with Jody's interpretation, that this painting tells the story of a woman turning into a monster. What magnificent and spot-on understanding, I think, of the internal dialog of Ida, who appears to be merely going through the motions of maintaining a fiction of youth. At first the kids identified the hand mirror as a hand mirror, but as we talked most of them seemed to think that it was, in fact, some sort of stringed instrument, "like a guitar." Sienna suggested that perhaps she was going to play it to make herself happier.
So, I took the weekend off... Sorry... I'm a slacker. :( A few times I thought of going back to blog, but I never got around to it. Bad, bad me! I was sucked into the Vampire Diaries! I seriously just sat around and watched TV all day long! On my iPad. My kids had a clean their rooms day on Saturday. I did help, so it wasn't like I did nothing. Jim and Joe's room was spotless. Eme's too. And Jake's. And Tom's. It was quite the long and tiring process.
Suleman, dubbed Octomom by the media, wants a fresh start and said in a statement that filing for bankruptcy is what’s best for her children, according to the Orange County Register.
Embarrassing when the girl you write about in your best-selling book comes forward to say she wasn't the one. More embarrassing when the girl from New York is actually a girl from Chicago, but the justification is that some girl in some town was white and Obama was black, or at least half-black raised by a white grandmother, and the important thing is to illustrate the residual racism percolating under the surface at all times.
Jesus: I think I still draw the same way and sometimes, they tell me, better. Although things do not always go as you want!
Or crack the keel behind them, or stave it with their fists.
Yes, you may print this off and pass it around. Just don’t charge money for it and acknowledge where it came from.
(Yes he says it just like that with a-tti-tude!)
o December 2008 to December 2011
I have to admit, you were a perfectly good dog until we ruined you. It’s all our fault for letting you eat people food and sleep in our bed. Those decisions came back to haunt us more than once. Do you remember the ham and beans? I do. I was pregnant with Chickie and we had both had a ham and bean dinner (you helped yourself, as I recall). Except yours didn’t agree with you and you made a desperate dash to the front door. As I reached the foyer to let you out you started to lose your ham and beans. And then I stepped in it with my pregnant bare foot. And then I started to lose my ham and beans. I doubt if anyone else has had the pleasure of throwing up out in the front yard alongside their dog. Thank you for that. Daddy almost thought it was funny until he had to clean it up.
This is a really lovely, simple dish that I feel works well when coupled with long hours of study. Traditionally a street and breakfast food in Egypt, it is simple to prepare (albeit time consuming if starting from dried beans), nourishing and flavourful. I discovered the fava beans in my pantry yesterday, as I'd completely forgotten I had purchased them a few weeks back so I could have easy study food that didn't involve pizza delivery. Here's my version of them, which is slightly a-typical in that I mix my pickles directly in it before serving. Well, that, and I forgot to boil some eggs. Hope you enjoy!
As Sasirekha receives blessings from her parents and then from her aunt Rukmini Devi, your heart jumps with joy to see Sri Krishna as he comes up to bless her. You feel Krishna’s presence throughout this movie, whether He is actually “in the shot” or not. That is another delightful thing about this movie.
At a press conference Saturday, Tulsa police Chief Chuck Jordan called the attacks vicious and cowardly and said his agency was going to do whatever it takes to apprehend anyone involved.
